South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5683.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 19, Title 7 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 7-19-35. The State is divided into seven congressional districts as follows: District 1 Population County: Beaufort SC 187,117 County: Berkeley SC VTD: Alvin 1,230 VTD: Bethera 350 VTD: Beverly Hills 2,179 VTD: Bonneau 1,892 VTD: Bonneau Beach 2,100 VTD: Boulder Bluff 3,803 VTD: Bushy Park 42 VTD: Cainhoy 1,522 VTD: Cane Bay 5,038 VTD: Cane Bay East 1,877 VTD: Cane Bay North 2,008 VTD: Cane Bay South 3,131 VTD: Carnes Cross Road 2 1,460 VTD: Carnes Cross Roads 1 2,474 VTD: Central 3,890 VTD: Cobblestone 3,345 VTD: Cordesville 1,777 VTD: Cross 1,630 VTD: Cypress 3,422 VTD: Daniel Island 1 2,858 VTD: Daniel Island 2 2,513 VTD: Daniel Island 3 2,658 VTD: Daniel Island 4 4,103 VTD: Devon Forest 1 3,611 VTD: Devon Forest 2 2,516 VTD: Discovery 3,657 VTD: Fifty-two 2,566 VTD: Foster Creek 1 1,863 VTD: Foster Creek 2 2,960 VTD: Foster Creek 3 2,732 VTD: Fox Bank 3,894 VTD: Hanahan 1 3,439 VTD: Hanahan 2 2,527 VTD: Hanahan 3 2,578 VTD: Hanahan 4 2,486 VTD: Hanahan 5 2,829 VTD: Harbour Lake 3,979 VTD: Hilton Cross Rd 2,729 VTD: Horseshoe 2,005 VTD: Howe Hall 1 4,146 VTD: Howe Hall 2 1,993 VTD: Huger 1,972 VTD: Jamestown 716 VTD: Lebanon 1,161 VTD: Liberty Hall 3,754 VTD: Live Oak 2,502 VTD: Macedonia 2,245 VTD: Macedonia 2 306 VTD: McBeth 1,324 VTD: Medway 4,026 VTD: Moncks Corner 1 3,070 VTD: Moncks Corner 2 2,658 VTD: Moncks Corner 3 3,461 VTD: Moncks Corner 4 2,159 VTD: Nexton 2,619 VTD: North Creek 1,017 VTD: Old 52 2,162 VTD: Pimlico 1,586 VTD: Pine Grove 0 VTD: Pinopolis 2,417 VTD: Pomflant 6 VTD: Royle 1,991 VTD: Russellville Block: 450150203031003 95 Block: 450150203031004 57 Block: 450150203031005 0 Block: 450150203031006 0 Block: 450150203031007 0 Block: 450150203031008 0 Block: 450150203031009 0 Block: 450150203031011 0 Block: 450150203031012 0 Block: 450150203031013 0 Block: 450150203031014 3 Block: 450150203031015 56 Block: 450150203031016 7 Block: 450150203031017 298 Block: 450150203031019 0 Block: 450150203031020 15 Block: 450150203031021 69 Block: 450150203031025 37 Block: 450150203031058 0 Block: 450150203041005 0 Block: 450150203044002 0 VTD Russellville Subtotal 637 VTD: Sangaree 1 2,055 VTD: Sangaree 2 2,316 VTD: Sangaree 3 2,109 VTD: Sedgefield 1 3,030 VTD: Sedgefield 2 5,590 VTD: Sedgefield 3 957 VTD: Seventy Eight 2,595 VTD: Shulerville 488 VTD: St. James 3,114 VTD: St. Stephen 1 Block: 450150202011048 63 Block: 450150202011059 26 Block: 450150202011060 14 Block: 450150202011063 43 Block: 450150202011064 0 Block: 450150202011065 83 Block: 450150203031000 11 Block: 450150203031001 117 Block: 450150203031002 8 VTD St. Stephen 1 Subtotal 365 VTD: St. Stephen 2 Block: 450150202011047 0 Block: 450150202012004 78 Block: 450150202012005 0 Block: 450150202012011 13 Block: 450150202012012 134 Block: 450150202012013 5 Block: 450150202012014 35 Block: 450150202012015 38 Block: 450150202012016 16 Block: 450150202012020 202 Block: 450150202012021 10 Block: 450150202012022 41 Block: 450150202012023 38 Block: 450150202012026 9 Block: 450150202012027 92 Block: 450150202012031 11 Block: 450150202012032 14 Block: 450150202012033 80 Block: 450150202012044 58 Block: 450150202012047 195 Block: 450150202012048 8 Block: 450150202012049 5 Block: 450150202012050 9 Block: 450150202012051 19 Block: 450150202012052 15 Block: 450150202012053 64 Block: 450150202012054 0 Block: 450150202012055 0 Block: 450150202012063 35 Block: 450150202012064 2 Block: 450150202012065 105 Block: 450150202012066 31 Block: 450150202012067 37 Block: 450150202012071 55 Block: 450150202012072 2 VTD St. Stephen 2 Subtotal 1,456 VTD: Stone Lake 1,899 VTD: Stratford 1 4,310 VTD: Stratford 2 2,110 VTD: Stratford 3 3,338 VTD: Stratford 4 3,016 VTD: Stratford 5 2,648 VTD: The Village 3,549 VTD: Tramway 2,172 VTD: Wassamassaw 1 1,636 VTD: Wassamassaw 2 3,703 VTD: Weatherstone 3,499 VTD: Westview 1 1,824 VTD: Westview 2 2,417 VTD: Westview 3 2,624 VTD: Westview 4 2,092 VTD: Whitesville 1 3,433 VTD: Whitesville 2 1,511 VTD: Wildcat Trail 459 VTD: Yellow House 3,772 County Berkeley SC Subtotal 223,688 County: Charleston SC VTD: Edisto Island 1,884 VTD: James Island 2 7,318 VTD: Johns Island 1A 2,742 VTD: Johns Island 1B 3,313 VTD: Johns Island 3A 5,443 VTD: Johns Island 3B 2,184 VTD: Johns Island 4 1,860 VTD: Kiawah Island 2,012 VTD: St. Andrews 16 Block: 450190028012000 0 Block: 450190028012001 0 Block: 450190028012002 150 Block: 450190028012003 0 Block: 450190028012004 0 Block: 450190028012005 0 Block: 450190028012006 57 Block: 450190028012007 0 Block: 450190028012008 0 Block: 450190028012021 30 Block: 450190028012026 2 Block: 450190028012048 101 Block: 450190028012049 66 Block: 450190028012050 58 Block: 450190028012051 49 Block: 450190028012052 40 Block: 450190028012053 12 Block: 450190028012054 9 Block: 450190028012055 0 Block: 450190028012056 0 Block: 450190028012057 32 Block: 450190028012059 25 Block: 450190028012060 2 Block: 450190028013042 11 Block: 450190028013043 246 Block: 450190028013044 6 Block: 450190028013045 6 Block: 450190028013047 31 Block: 450190028013049 4 Block: 450190028013050 2 Block: 450190028013051 25 Block: 450190028013053 35 Block: 450190028013054 12 Block: 450190028013057 47 Block: 450190028013058 2 Block: 450190028013059 24 Block: 450190028013060 5 Block: 450190028013064 8 Block: 450190028013065 27 Block: 450190028013066 22 Block: 450190028013067 0 Block: 450190028013069 2 Block: 450190028013070 8 Block: 450190028013071 22 Block: 450190028013073 1 Block: 450190028013075 0 Block: 450190028013076 21 Block: 450190028013077 1 Block: 450190028013078 14 Block: 450190028013079 0 Block: 450190028013080 13 Block: 450190028013095 5 Block: 450190028013098 0 VTD St. Andrews 16 Subtotal 1,233 VTD: St. Andrews 17 2,290 VTD: St. Andrews 22 Block: 450190026111000 0 Block: 450190026111001 0 Block: 450190026111002 0 Block: 450190026111003 188 Block: 450190026111004 71 Block: 450190026111005 263 Block: 450190026111006 55 Block: 450190026111007 39 Block: 450190026111008 168 Block: 450190026111009 129 Block: 450190026111010 25 Block: 450190026111011 43 Block: 450190026111012 133 Block: 450190026111013 6 Block: 450190026111017 0 Block: 450190026111018 5 Block: 450190026112000 57 Block: 450190026112001 0 Block: 450190026112002 0 Block: 450190026112003 16 Block: 450190026112004 142 Block: 450190026112005 47 Block: 450190026112006 0 Block: 450190026112007 10 Block: 450190026112008 4 Block: 450190026112009 9 Block: 450190026112010 3 Block: 450190026112011 7 Block: 450190026112012 12 Block: 450190026112013 35 Block: 450190026112014 4 Block: 450190026112015 9 Block: 450190026112016 6 Block: 450190026112036 30 Block: 450190026121000 0 Block: 450190026121001 0 VTD St. Andrews 22 Subtotal 1,516 VTD: St. Andrews 23 1,491 VTD: St. Andrews 26 Block: 450190026141024 275 Block: 450190026141025 6 Block: 450190026141026 16 Block: 450190026141027 5 Block: 450190026141028 9 Block: 450190026141029 0 Block: 450190026141030 6 Block: 450190026141031 28 Block: 450190026141032 5 Block: 450190026141033 27 Block: 450190026141034 0 Block: 450190026141035 29 Block: 450190026141036 10 Block: 450190026141037 11 Block: 450190026141038 5 Block: 450190026141039 75 Block: 450190026141040 21 Block: 450190026141041 20 Block: 450190026141042 13 Block: 450190026141057 4 Block: 450190026141058 2 Block: 450190026141059 8 Block: 450190026141060 10 Block: 450190026141061 18 Block: 450190026141062 3 Block: 450190026141066 4 Block: 450190026141067 12 Block: 450190026141068 9 Block: 450190026142008 11 Block: 450190026142009 48 Block: 450190026142010 4 Block: 450190026142011 9 Block: 450190026142012 3 Block: 450190026142013 41 Block: 450190026142014 4 Block: 450190026142015 39 Block: 450190026142016 6 Block: 450190026142017 23 Block: 450190026142018 1 Block: 450190026142019 19 Block: 450190026142020 18 Block: 450190026142021 35 Block: 450190026142022 10 Block: 450190026142023 266 Block: 450190026142024 0 Block: 450190026142025 1 Block: 450190026142027 6 Block: 450190026142030 24 Block: 450190026142038 2 Block: 450190026142039 0 Block: 450190026142042 0 Block: 450190026142043 34 Block: 450190026142044 3 Block: 450190026142045 1 Block: 450190026142046 25 Block: 450190026142047 0 Block: 450190026142048 16 Block: 450190026142049 9 Block: 450190026142050 5 Block: 450190026142051 24 Block: 450190026142052 3 Block: 450190026142053 12 Block: 450190026142054 6 Block: 450190026142055 6 Block: 450190026142056 43 Block: 450190026142057 18 Block: 450190026142058 2 Block: 450190026142059 14 Block: 450190026142060 0 Block: 450190026142061 0 Block: 450190026142062 0 Block: 450190026142063 36 Block: 450190026142066 4 VTD St. Andrews 26 Subtotal 1,462 VTD: St. Andrews 27 6,553 VTD: St. Andrews 28 4,758 VTD: St. Andrews 29 5,106 VTD: St. Andrews 30 2,771 VTD: St. Andrews 31 1,800 VTD: St. Andrews 32 1,476 VTD: St. Andrews 33 1,037 VTD: St. Andrews 34 3,060 VTD: St. Andrews 35 2,078 VTD: St. Andrews 36 2,058 VTD: St. Andrews 37 6,444 VTD: St. Andrews 7 Block: 450190028013000 14 Block: 450190028013001 38 Block: 450190028013002 8 Block: 450190028013003 4 Block: 450190028013004 16 Block: 450190028013005 74 Block: 450190028013006 0 Block: 450190028013007 55 Block: 450190028013008 13 Block: 450190028013009 7 Block: 450190028013010 19 Block: 450190028013011 2 Block: 450190028013012 15 Block: 450190028013013 3 Block: 450190028013014 7 Block: 450190028013015 7 Block: 450190028013016 16 Block: 450190028013017 1 Block: 450190028013018 30 Block: 450190028013019 0 Block: 450190028013020 11 Block: 450190028013021 6 Block: 450190028013022 7 Block: 450190028013023 78 Block: 450190028013024 46 Block: 450190028013025 20 Block: 450190028013026 6 Block: 450190028013027 2 Block: 450190028013028 10 Block: 450190028013029 21 Block: 450190028013030 4 Block: 450190028013031 1 Block: 450190028013032 30 Block: 450190028013033 5 Block: 450190028013034 11 Block: 450190028013035 4 Block: 450190028013036 9 Block: 450190028013037 3 Block: 450190028013038 3 Block: 450190028013039 32 Block: 450190028013040 5 Block: 450190028013041 1 Block: 450190028013046 3 Block: 450190028013048 0 Block: 450190028013052 0 Block: 450190028013055 14 Block: 450190028013056 5 Block: 450190028013061 25 Block: 450190028013062 24 Block: 450190028013063 6 Block: 450190028013068 23 Block: 450190028013072 4 Block: 450190028013074 8 Block: 450190028013081 5 Block: 450190028013082 18 Block: 450190028013083 2 Block: 450190028013084 21 Block: 450190028013085 2 Block: 450190028013086 4 Block: 450190028013087 6 Block: 450190028013088 3 Block: 450190028013089 15 Block: 450190028013090 10 Block: 450190028013091 10 Block: 450190028013092 19 Block: 450190028013093 0 Block: 450190028013094 2 Block: 450190028013096 9 Block: 450190028013097 4 VTD St. Andrews 7 Subtotal 886 VTD: St. Pauls 1 1,103 VTD: St. Pauls 2A 1,261 VTD: St. Pauls 2B 1,786 VTD: St. Pauls 3 2,385 VTD: St. Pauls 4 2,400 VTD: St. Pauls 5 1,821 VTD: St. Pauls 6 2,907 VTD: Town of Seabrook 2,178 VTD: Wadmalaw Island 1 1,406 VTD: Wadmalaw Island 2 1,442 County Charleston SC Subtotal 91,464 County: Colleton SC 38,604 County: Dorchester SC 161,540 County: Jasper SC 28,791 District 1 Total 731,204 District 2 County: Aiken SC 168,808 County: Allendale SC 8,039 County: Bamberg SC 13,311 County: Barnwell SC 20,589 County: Calhoun SC 14,119 County: Hampton SC 18,561 County: Lexington SC 293,991 County: Orangeburg SC 84,223 County: Richland SC VTD: Arcadia Block: 450790113061041 0 Block: 450790113061042 33 Block: 450790113061043 11 VTD Arcadia Subtotal 44 VTD: Bluff 3,208 VTD: Brandon 1 3,590 VTD: Brandon 2 3,750 VTD: Caughman Road 2,657 VTD: Cooper 1,436 VTD: East Forest Acres 1,545 VTD: Eastover 1,502 VTD: Gadsden 1,606 VTD: Garners 1,378 VTD: Gregg Park 3,319 VTD: Hopkins 1 1,825 VTD: Hopkins 2 2,151 VTD: Horrell Hill 3,759 VTD: Hunting Creek 693 VTD: Keenan Block: 450790111011019 8 Block: 450790111011020 11 Block: 450790111011021 3 Block: 450790111011028 12 Block: 450790111011029 11 Block: 450790111011030 15 Block: 450790111011031 0 Block: 450790111011032 19 Block: 450790111011033 7 Block: 450790111011034 10 Block: 450790111011038 3 Block: 450790111011039 49 Block: 450790111011040 17 Block: 450790111011041 19 Block: 450790111011042 0 VTD Keenan Subtotal 184 VTD: Lykesland 2,531 VTD: McEntire 1,070 VTD: Meadowfield 2,326 VTD: Mill Creek 2,127 VTD: North Forest Acres Block: 450790112022001 40 Block: 450790112022030 32 Block: 450790112022031 31 Block: 450790112022033 58 VTD North Forest Acres Subtotal 161 VTD: Oakwood Block: 450790111022025 16 Block: 450790111022026 36 Block: 450790111022027 5 Block: 450790111022028 28 Block: 450790111022029 11 Block: 450790111022030 20 Block: 450790111022031 0 Block: 450790111022032 83 Block: 450790111022033 0 Block: 450790111022034 31 Block: 450790111022035 9 Block: 450790111022036 5 Block: 450790111022037 21 Block: 450790111022038 15 Block: 450790111022039 15 Block: 450790111022040 25 Block: 450790111022041 27 Block: 450790111022042 25 Block: 450790111022043 6 Block: 450790111022044 7 Block: 450790111022045 8 Block: 450790111022046 25 Block: 450790111022047 8 Block: 450790111022048 60 Block: 450790111022049 7 Block: 450790111022050 30 Block: 450790111022051 2 Block: 450790111022052 8 Block: 450790111022053 16 Block: 450790111023008 31 Block: 450790111023009 6 Block: 450790111023010 15 Block: 450790111023011 6 Block: 450790111023012 0 Block: 450790111023013 25 Block: 450790111023014 14 Block: 450790111023015 1 Block: 450790111023031 12 Block: 450790111023032 32 VTD Oakwood Subtotal 691 VTD: Olympia Block: 450790027003025 0 Block: 450790027003037 0 Block: 450790028001027 17 Block: 450790028001028 32 Block: 450790028001029 7 Block: 450790028001030 7 Block: 450790028001031 13 Block: 450790028001034 0 Block: 450790028001035 0 Block: 450790028001037 1 Block: 450790028001038 0 Block: 450790028001044 7 Block: 450790028001050 12 Block: 450790028001051 5 Block: 450790028001052 891 Block: 450790028001054 0 Block: 450790028001055 0 Block: 450790028001056 0 Block: 450790028001059 0 Block: 450790028002000 0 Block: 450790028002001 0 Block: 450790028002002 0 Block: 450790028002003 0 Block: 450790028002004 0 Block: 450790028002005 54 Block: 450790028002006 0 Block: 450790028002007 0 Block: 450790028002008 81 Block: 450790028002009 15 Block: 450790028002010 14 Block: 450790028002011 0 Block: 450790028002012 0 Block: 450790028002013 0 Block: 450790028002014 0 Block: 450790028002015 73 Block: 450790028002016 57 Block: 450790028002017 20 Block: 450790028002018 9 Block: 450790028002019 10 Block: 450790028002020 14 Block: 450790028002021 22 Block: 450790028002022 30 Block: 450790028002023 47 Block: 450790028002024 4 Block: 450790028002025 19 Block: 450790028002026 0 Block: 450790028002027 35 Block: 450790028002028 18 Block: 450790028002029 23 Block: 450790028002030 39 Block: 450790028002031 18 Block: 450790028002032 58 Block: 450790028002033 28 Block: 450790028002034 25 Block: 450790028002035 46 Block: 450790028002036 48 Block: 450790028002037 54 Block: 450790028002038 48 Block: 450790028002039 7 Block: 450790028002040 19 Block: 450790028002041 0 Block: 450790028002042 0 Block: 450790028002043 0 Block: 450790028002044 0 Block: 450790028002045 0 Block: 450790028002046 0 Block: 450790028002047 0 Block: 450790028002048 28 Block: 450790028002049 25 Block: 450790028002050 36 Block: 450790028002051 25 Block: 450790028002052 16 Block: 450790028002053 34 Block: 450790028002054 0 Block: 450790028002055 0 Block: 450790028002056 0 Block: 450790028002057 20 Block: 450790028002058 0 Block: 450790028002059 0 Block: 450790028003020 0 Block: 450790028003021 7 Block: 450790028003022 0 Block: 450790028003025 0 Block: 450790028003027 0 Block: 450790028003028 0 Block: 450790117011019 0 Block: 450790117011020 0 Block: 450790117011021 0 Block: 450790117011022 0 Block: 450790117011025 0 Block: 450790117011026 0 Block: 450790117011027 0 Block: 450790117011028 0 Block: 450790117011029 0 Block: 450790117011030 0 Block: 450790117011031 0 Block: 450790117011032 0 Block: 450790117011033 0 Block: 450790117011034 0 Block: 450790117011035 0 Block: 450790117011036 0 Block: 450790117011037 0 Block: 450790117011038 0 Block: 450790117011039 0 Block: 450790117011040 0 Block: 450790117011041 0 Block: 450790117011042 0 Block: 450790117011043 0 Block: 450790117011044 0 Block: 450790117011045 17 Block: 450790117011046 0 Block: 450790117011047 0 Block: 450790117011048 0 Block: 450790117011049 0 Block: 450790117012023 913 Block: 450790117012024 0 Block: 450790117012025 0 Block: 450790117012026 0 Block: 450790117012027 0 Block: 450790117012028 0 Block: 450790117012029 0 Block: 450790117012030 0 Block: 450790117012031 0 Block: 450790117012032 0 Block: 450790117012033 0 Block: 450790117012034 0 Block: 450790117012035 0 Block: 450790117012036 0 Block: 450790117012037 0 Block: 450790117012038 0 Block: 450790117012039 0 Block: 450790117012040 0 Block: 450790117012041 6 Block: 450790117012042 167 Block: 450790117012045 0 Block: 450790117012046 0 Block: 450790117012047 0 Block: 450790117012048 0 Block: 450790117012049 0 Block: 450790117012050 0 Block: 450790117012051 493 Block: 450790117012052 0 Block: 450790117012053 0 Block: 450790117012054 113 Block: 450790117012055 16 Block: 450790117012056 7 Block: 450790117012057 4 Block: 450790117012058 5 Block: 450790117012059 11 Block: 450790117012060 0 Block: 450790117012067 14 Block: 450790117012068 73 Block: 450790117012069 0 Block: 450790117012071 0 Block: 450790117012072 0 Block: 450790117012073 0 Block: 450790117012074 0 Block: 450790117012075 0 Block: 450790117012076 0 Block: 450790117012077 0 Block: 450790117012078 0 Block: 450790117012079 0 Block: 450790117012082 42 Block: 450790117021016 0 Block: 450790117022054 0 Block: 450790117022068 0 Block: 450790117022069 0 VTD Olympia Subtotal 3,999 VTD: Pennington 1 1,292 VTD: Pennington 2 2,115 VTD: Pine Lakes 1 1,810 VTD: Pine Lakes 2 2,522 VTD: Pinewood 3,022 VTD: Pontiac 1 Block: 450790114071003 8 Block: 450790114071005 35 Block: 450790114071010 52 Block: 450790114071011 0 Block: 450790114071012 0 Block: 450790114071017 33 Block: 450790114071018 47 Block: 450790114071019 30 Block: 450790114071020 7 Block: 450790114071021 9 Block: 450790114071022 39 Block: 450790120001000 0 Block: 450790120001001 0 Block: 450790120001008 0 Block: 450790120001009 0 Block: 450790120001010 12 Block: 450790120001011 49 Block: 450790120001012 14 Block: 450790120001015 24 Block: 450790120001016 19 Block: 450790120001112 0 VTD Pontiac 1 Subtotal 378 VTD: Satchelford 2,010 VTD: South Forest Acres Block: 450790012001013 14 Block: 450790012001020 0 Block: 450790012001022 11 Block: 450790012001026 13 Block: 450790024003019 27 Block: 450790024003020 19 Block: 450790024003021 28 Block: 450790024003022 9 Block: 450790024003023 7 Block: 450790024003034 14 Block: 450790112011001 142 Block: 450790112011002 215 Block: 450790112011003 2 Block: 450790112011004 0 Block: 450790112011005 7 Block: 450790112011006 34 Block: 450790112011007 27 Block: 450790112011008 50 Block: 450790112011009 3 Block: 450790112011011 27 Block: 450790112011012 18 Block: 450790112011013 0 Block: 450790112011014 25 Block: 450790112011015 33 Block: 450790112011016 31 Block: 450790112011017 30 Block: 450790112011021 0 Block: 450790112011022 0 Block: 450790112011026 8 Block: 450790112011029 8 Block: 450790112012000 18 Block: 450790112012001 0 Block: 450790112012002 30 Block: 450790112012003 28 Block: 450790112012004 10 Block: 450790112012005 0 Block: 450790112012006 6 Block: 450790112012007 27 Block: 450790112012008 31 Block: 450790112012009 23 Block: 450790112012010 14 Block: 450790112012020 5 VTD South Forest Acres Subtotal 994 VTD: Trenholm Road Block: 450790111021051 11 Block: 450790111021052 5 Block: 450790111022000 0 Block: 450790111022001 39 Block: 450790111022002 6 Block: 450790111022003 0 Block: 450790111022004 21 Block: 450790111022005 0 Block: 450790111022006 0 Block: 450790111022007 15 Block: 450790111022008 9 Block: 450790111022009 21 Block: 450790111022010 7 Block: 450790111022011 21 Block: 450790111022012 0 Block: 450790111022013 6 Block: 450790111022014 2 Block: 450790111022015 0 Block: 450790111022016 4 Block: 450790111022017 15 Block: 450790111022018 14 Block: 450790111022019 14 Block: 450790111022020 30 Block: 450790111022021 7 Block: 450790111022022 0 Block: 450790111022023 0 Block: 450790111022024 8 Block: 450790111022054 7 Block: 450790111023000 11 Block: 450790111023001 1 Block: 450790111023002 3 Block: 450790111023003 10 Block: 450790111023004 22 Block: 450790111023005 0 Block: 450790111023006 10 Block: 450790111023007 6 Block: 450790111023016 17 Block: 450790111023017 2 Block: 450790111023018 6 Block: 450790111023019 15 Block: 450790111023020 16 Block: 450790111023021 21 Block: 450790111023022 9 Block: 450790111023023 0 VTD Trenholm Road Subtotal 411 VTD: Trinity 2,530 VTD: Ward 1 6,183 VTD: Ward 10 Block: 450790027003024 11 Block: 450790027003026 8 Block: 450790027003028 3 Block: 450790027003036 13 VTD Ward 10 Subtotal 35 VTD: Ward 16 1,642 VTD: Ward 17 Block: 450790023002000 191 Block: 450790023002001 46 Block: 450790023002002 20 Block: 450790023002003 81 Block: 450790023002012 41 Block: 450790023002013 62 Block: 450790023002014 83 Block: 450790023002015 48 Block: 450790023002016 88 Block: 450790023002017 56 Block: 450790023003015 119 Block: 450790024001018 31 Block: 450790024001019 34 Block: 450790024001020 155 Block: 450790024001021 31 Block: 450790024001022 23 Block: 450790024001024 55 Block: 450790024001025 22 Block: 450790024001026 38 Block: 450790024001027 62 Block: 450790024001028 19 Block: 450790024001029 8 Block: 450790024001030 47 Block: 450790024001031 36 Block: 450790024001032 58 Block: 450790024001033 52 Block: 450790024001034 15 Block: 450790024001035 23 Block: 450790024001037 22 Block: 450790024001038 55 Block: 450790024001039 66 Block: 450790024001040 0 Block: 450790024001041 8 Block: 450790116032024 0 Block: 450790116032026 0 Block: 450790116032027 0 VTD Ward 17 Subtotal 1,695 VTD: Ward 24 1,365 VTD: Ward 25 2,579 VTD: Ward 26 10,666 VTD: Ward 5 8,651 VTD: Webber 1,598 VTD: Woodlands 2,909 County Richland SC Subtotal 99,959 County: Sumter SC VTD: DALZELL 1 Block: 450850002021027 19 Block: 450850002021035 0 Block: 450850002022026 87 Block: 450850002022027 106 Block: 450850002022028 460 Block: 450850002022031 61 Block: 450850003001000 0 Block: 450850003001008 0 Block: 450850003001010 48 Block: 450850003001011 0 Block: 450850003001012 0 Block: 450850003002000 322 Block: 450850003002001 80 Block: 450850003002002 0 Block: 450850003002003 0 Block: 450850003002004 17 Block: 450850003002005 118 Block: 450850003002006 0 Block: 450850003002007 0 Block: 450850003002008 37 Block: 450850003002009 45 Block: 450850003002010 51 Block: 450850003002011 128 Block: 450850003002012 18 Block: 450850003002013 106 Block: 450850003004006 0 Block: 450850003004008 0 Block: 450850003004009 0 Block: 450850003004011 0 Block: 450850003004012 0 Block: 450850003004013 0 VTD DALZELL 1 Subtotal 1,703 VTD: DELAINE Block: 450850018041002 8 Block: 450850018041003 24 Block: 450850018041006 5 Block: 450850018041007 0 Block: 450850018041010 93 Block: 450850018041011 29 Block: 450850018041088 0 Block: 450850018043015 0 VTD DELAINE Subtotal 159 VTD: GREEN SWAMP Block: 450850002023024 0 Block: 450850002023026 0 Block: 450850003003000 0 Block: 450850003003001 0 Block: 450850003003002 0 Block: 450850003003003 0 Block: 450850003003004 0 Block: 450850003003008 0 Block: 450850003003009 0 VTD GREEN SWAMP Subtotal 0 VTD: HILLCREST Block: 450850001001068 0 Block: 450850002021007 0 Block: 450850002021008 44 Block: 450850002021009 76 Block: 450850002021011 14 Block: 450850002021012 40 Block: 450850002021013 39 Block: 450850002021014 0 Block: 450850002021015 60 Block: 450850002021016 46 Block: 450850002021017 34 Block: 450850002021018 20 Block: 450850002021019 4 Block: 450850002021020 102 Block: 450850002021021 14 Block: 450850002021022 40 Block: 450850002021023 47 Block: 450850002021024 55 Block: 450850002021025 445 Block: 450850002021026 27 Block: 450850002021028 33 Block: 450850002021029 41 Block: 450850002021030 45 Block: 450850002021031 38 Block: 450850002021032 7 Block: 450850002021033 13 Block: 450850002021034 18 Block: 450850002021036 0 Block: 450850002021037 56 Block: 450850002021038 22 Block: 450850002021039 7 Block: 450850002021040 27 Block: 450850002021041 29 VTD HILLCREST Subtotal 1,443 VTD: HORATIO 652 VTD: OAKLAND PLANTATION 1 1,948 VTD: OAKLAND PLANTATION 2 1,610 VTD: SAINT PAUL Block: 450850018041001 0 Block: 450850018043012 0 Block: 450850018043013 0 Block: 450850018043014 0 VTD SAINT PAUL Subtotal 0 VTD: SHAW 2,088 County Sumter SC Subtotal 9,603 District 2 Total 731,203 District 3 County: Abbeville SC 24,295 County: Anderson SC 203,718 County: Edgefield SC 25,657 County: Greenwood SC 69,351 County: McCormick SC 9,526 County: Newberry SC 37,719 County: Oconee SC 78,607 County: Pickens SC VTD: Abel 2,291 VTD: Brushy Creek 2,398 VTD: Calhoun 3,546 VTD: Clemson 2,784 VTD: Crestview 1,883 VTD: Easley Block: 450770108021021 12 VTD Easley Subtotal 12 VTD: East Liberty 1,915 VTD: Flat Rock 2,186 VTD: Fruit Mountain Block: 450770108031020 0 Block: 450770108031021 0 Block: 450770108032001 0 Block: 450770108032009 0 Block: 450770108032012 222 Block: 450770108032013 55 Block: 450770108032014 32 Block: 450770108032015 111 Block: 450770108032016 28 Block: 450770108032017 28 Block: 450770108032019 38 Block: 450770108032020 8 Block: 450770108032025 335 Block: 450770108032026 22 Block: 450770108032027 8 Block: 450770108032028 39 Block: 450770108032029 11 Block: 450770108032030 17 Block: 450770108032031 29 Block: 450770108033000 60 Block: 450770108033001 94 Block: 450770108033002 47 Block: 450770108033003 18 Block: 450770108033004 93 Block: 450770108061023 0 Block: 450770108061024 15 Block: 450770108061025 5 Block: 450770108061027 0 Block: 450770108062018 39 Block: 450770108062019 36 Block: 450770108062020 39 Block: 450770108062021 67 Block: 450770108062024 35 Block: 450770108062025 8 Block: 450770108062026 20 VTD Fruit Mountain Subtotal 1,559 VTD: Issaqueena 1,625 VTD: Lawrence Chapel 1,668 VTD: McAlister 1,770 VTD: Morrison 5,468 VTD: Norris 1,851 VTD: North Central 1,938 VTD: Pendleton 1,768 VTD: Pickensville Block: 450770108031001 24 Block: 450770108031002 16 Block: 450770108031003 25 Block: 450770108031004 14 Block: 450770108031006 15 Block: 450770108031008 29 Block: 450770108031009 6 Block: 450770108031010 12 Block: 450770108031011 0 Block: 450770108031037 22 Block: 450770108031038 22 Block: 450770108031039 45 Block: 450770108031040 40 Block: 450770108031041 29 Block: 450770108031042 29 Block: 450770108031043 17 Block: 450770108031049 0 Block: 450770108031050 0 Block: 450770108041013 17 Block: 450770108041014 6 Block: 450770108041015 6 Block: 450770108041016 22 Block: 450770108041017 0 Block: 450770108042023 31 Block: 450770108042024 26 Block: 450770108042025 40 Block: 450770108042026 14 Block: 450770108042029 24 Block: 450770108042030 18 Block: 450770108043001 0 Block: 450770108043002 0 Block: 450770108043003 35 Block: 450770108043004 3 Block: 450770108043005 0 Block: 450770108043006 104 Block: 450770108043007 22 Block: 450770108043008 31 Block: 450770108043009 211 Block: 450770108043011 42 Block: 450770108043012 22 Block: 450770108043013 30 Block: 450770108043014 36 Block: 450770108043015 178 Block: 450770108043016 25 Block: 450770108043017 39 Block: 450770108043018 29 Block: 450770108043019 12 Block: 450770108043020 0 Block: 450770108043021 6 Block: 450770108043022 28 Block: 450770108043023 35 Block: 450770108043027 0 Block: 450770108043029 0 Block: 450770108043032 0 VTD Pickensville Subtotal 1,437 VTD: Pike 1,598 VTD: Pope Field Block: 450770108043010 0 Block: 450770108043024 0 Block: 450770108043025 67 Block: 450770108043026 24 Block: 450770108043028 8 Block: 450770108043030 281 Block: 450770108043031 33 Block: 450770108043033 52 Block: 450770108043034 5 Block: 450770108043035 0 Block: 450770108043036 49 Block: 450770108043037 38 Block: 450770108043038 27 Block: 450770108043039 21 Block: 450770108043040 0 Block: 450770108043041 0 Block: 450770108043042 0 Block: 450770109012000 0 Block: 450770109012001 69 Block: 450770109012002 32 Block: 450770109012003 23 Block: 450770109012004 5 Block: 450770109012011 74 Block: 450770109012019 123 Block: 450770109012020 0 Block: 450770109012021 63 Block: 450770109012022 69 Block: 450770109012023 18 Block: 450770109012024 35 Block: 450770109012025 76 Block: 450770109012026 67 Block: 450770109012027 32 Block: 450770109012028 10 Block: 450770109012029 34 Block: 450770109012031 120 Block: 450770109012032 52 Block: 450770109012033 32 VTD Pope Field Subtotal 1,539 VTD: Praters Creek Block: 450770103011004 29 Block: 450770103011005 29 Block: 450770103011012 0 Block: 450770103011013 0 Block: 450770103011014 10 Block: 450770103011015 18 Block: 450770103011016 9 Block: 450770103011017 18 Block: 450770103011022 0 Block: 450770103011023 51 Block: 450770103011024 1 Block: 450770103011025 1 Block: 450770103011026 36 Block: 450770103011029 26 Block: 450770103011030 0 Block: 450770103011031 5 Block: 450770103011032 5 Block: 450770103011033 19 Block: 450770103011037 8 Block: 450770103011038 25 Block: 450770103011042 53 Block: 450770103011043 30 Block: 450770103011044 25 Block: 450770103011045 0 Block: 450770103011046 9 Block: 450770103011048 21 Block: 450770103011053 0 Block: 450770104031029 134 Block: 450770104031040 87 Block: 450770104031041 66 Block: 450770104031042 0 Block: 450770104031043 0 Block: 450770104031044 42 Block: 450770104031045 18 Block: 450770104031046 8 Block: 450770104031047 29 Block: 450770104031049 41 Block: 450770104031050 0 Block: 450770104031051 0 Block: 450770104031052 8 Block: 450770104031053 4 Block: 450770104031054 21 Block: 450770104041044 0 Block: 450770110012024 43 Block: 450770110012025 40 Block: 450770110012026 48 Block: 450770110012027 0 Block: 450770110012028 0 Block: 450770110012029 66 Block: 450770110012030 67 Block: 450770110012031 11 Block: 450770110012032 42 Block: 450770110012033 0 VTD Praters Creek Subtotal 1,203 VTD: Rices Creek 2,051 VTD: Sheffield 1,655 VTD: Simpson Block: 450770108021023 0 Block: 450770108031000 0 Block: 450770108031017 69 Block: 450770108031018 20 Block: 450770108031019 36 Block: 450770108032007 19 Block: 450770108032008 55 Block: 450770108032010 26 Block: 450770108032011 242 Block: 450770108043000 16 Block: 450770108061008 0 Block: 450770108061014 0 Block: 450770108061015 55 Block: 450770108061016 40 Block: 450770108061017 13 Block: 450770108061018 36 Block: 450770108061019 22 Block: 450770108061020 32 Block: 450770108061021 20 Block: 450770108061022 32 Block: 450770108061026 33 Block: 450770108061028 21 Block: 450770108061029 27 Block: 450770108061030 31 Block: 450770108061031 28 Block: 450770108061032 25 Block: 450770108061033 25 Block: 450770108061034 6 Block: 450770108061035 6 Block: 450770108061036 38 Block: 450770108061037 24 Block: 450770108061038 59 Block: 450770108061039 50 Block: 450770108061040 0 Block: 450770108061041 64 Block: 450770108061042 83 Block: 450770108061043 46 Block: 450770108061044 0 Block: 450770108062022 34 Block: 450770108062023 0 Block: 450770108062027 7 VTD Simpson Subtotal 1,340 VTD: Sitton 1,814 VTD: Six Mile 2,330 VTD: Six Mile Mountain 2,243 VTD: Smith Grove 1,611 VTD: South Central 2,426 VTD: Stone Church 2,016 VTD: Tri County 907 VTD: University 7,248 VTD: West Central 3,616 VTD: West Liberty 2,192 VTD: West Pickens Block: 450770104031025 36 Block: 450770104031027 190 VTD West Pickens Subtotal 226 VTD: Woodside 2,475 VTD: Zion 1,998 County Pickens SC Subtotal 76,587 County: Richland SC VTD: Arcadia Block: 450790113061003 0 Block: 450790113061004 0 Block: 450790113061005 2 Block: 450790113061006 0 Block: 450790113061007 42 Block: 450790113061008 0 Block: 450790113061009 0 Block: 450790113061010 0 Block: 450790113061011 0 Block: 450790113061012 30 Block: 450790113061013 115 Block: 450790113061014 3 Block: 450790113061015 12 Block: 450790113061016 10 Block: 450790113061017 1 Block: 450790113061018 56 Block: 450790113061019 0 Block: 450790113061020 8 Block: 450790113061021 31 Block: 450790113061022 8 Block: 450790113061023 44 Block: 450790113061024 1 Block: 450790113061025 18 Block: 450790113061026 0 Block: 450790113061027 16 Block: 450790113061028 1 Block: 450790113061029 22 Block: 450790113061030 11 Block: 450790113061031 11 Block: 450790113061032 20 Block: 450790113061033 0 Block: 450790113061034 10 Block: 450790113061035 6 Block: 450790113061036 28 Block: 450790113061037 37 Block: 450790113061038 8 Block: 450790113061039 6 Block: 450790113061040 12 Block: 450790113061044 14 Block: 450790113061045 23 Block: 450790113062000 21 Block: 450790113062001 7 Block: 450790113062002 52 Block: 450790113062003 3 Block: 450790113062004 27 Block: 450790113062005 4 Block: 450790113062006 2 Block: 450790113062007 39 Block: 450790113062008 6 Block: 450790113062009 12 Block: 450790113062010 20 Block: 450790113062011 3 Block: 450790113062012 19 Block: 450790113062013 11 Block: 450790113062014 6 Block: 450790113062015 16 Block: 450790113062016 24 Block: 450790113062017 10 Block: 450790113062018 16 Block: 450790113062019 0 Block: 450790113062020 1 Block: 450790113062021 19 Block: 450790113062022 19 Block: 450790113062023 9 Block: 450790113062024 8 Block: 450790113062025 0 Block: 450790113062026 8 Block: 450790113062027 6 Block: 450790113062028 4 Block: 450790113062029 11 Block: 450790113062030 25 Block: 450790113062031 8 Block: 450790113062032 66 Block: 450790113062033 6 Block: 450790113062034 19 Block: 450790113062035 22 Block: 450790113062036 6 Block: 450790113062037 20 Block: 450790113062038 20 Block: 450790113062039 28 Block: 450790113062040 3 Block: 450790113062041 0 Block: 450790113062042 19 Block: 450790113062043 49 Block: 450790113062044 26 Block: 450790113062045 46 Block: 450790113062046 6 Block: 450790113062047 5 Block: 450790113062048 0 Block: 450790113062049 0 Block: 450790113062050 8 Block: 450790113062051 15 Block: 450790113063000 206 Block: 450790113063001 7 Block: 450790113063002 45 Block: 450790113063003 0 Block: 450790113063004 8 Block: 450790113063005 266 Block: 450790113063006 6 Block: 450790113063007 0 Block: 450790113063008 0 Block: 450790113063009 18 Block: 450790113063010 8 Block: 450790113063011 61 Block: 450790113063012 3 Block: 450790113063013 5 Block: 450790113063014 3 Block: 450790113063015 16 Block: 450790113063016 4 Block: 450790113063017 4 Block: 450790113063018 20 Block: 450790113063019 0 Block: 450790113063020 18 Block: 450790113063021 28 Block: 450790113063022 20 Block: 450790113063023 12 Block: 450790113063024 12 VTD Arcadia Subtotal 2,156 VTD: Ardincaple 944 VTD: Ballentine 1 2,309 VTD: Ballentine 2 2,585 VTD: Beatty Road 2,018 VTD: Briarwood Block: 450790113033013 0 Block: 450790113033015 0 Block: 450790113033016 0 Block: 450790113033017 0 Block: 450790113033018 0 Block: 450790113033019 0 Block: 450790113033020 0 Block: 450790113033021 0 Block: 450790113033022 386 Block: 450790113033023 0 Block: 450790113033024 0 Block: 450790113033025 8 Block: 450790113033026 0 Block: 450790113033027 364 Block: 450790113033028 21 Block: 450790113033029 425 Block: 450790113033030 0 Block: 450790113033031 0 Block: 450790113033032 0 Block: 450790113033033 17 Block: 450790113033034 9 Block: 450790113033035 0 Block: 450790113033040 0 Block: 450790113033041 28 Block: 450790113042000 0 Block: 450790113042002 0 VTD Briarwood Subtotal 1,258 VTD: College Place 2,288 VTD: Dennyside 1,696 VTD: Dentsville 3,133 VTD: Dutch Fork 1 1,683 VTD: Dutch Fork 2 1,931 VTD: Dutch Fork 3 3,596 VTD: Dutch Fork 4 2,474 VTD: Edgewood 2,771 VTD: Fairlawn Block: 450790102002064 0 Block: 450790107021003 200 Block: 450790107021004 54 Block: 450790107021005 6 Block: 450790107021006 15 Block: 450790107021007 0 Block: 450790107021008 10 Block: 450790107021009 10 Block: 450790107021010 12 Block: 450790107021011 121 Block: 450790107021012 0 Block: 450790107021013 28 Block: 450790107021014 84 Block: 450790107021015 0 Block: 450790107021016 6 Block: 450790107021017 38 Block: 450790108061000 0 VTD Fairlawn Subtotal 584 VTD: Fairwold 1,046 VTD: Friarsgate 1 2,515 VTD: Friarsgate 2 2,064 VTD: Greenview 2,022 VTD: Hampton 2,831 VTD: Harbison 1 3,481 VTD: Harbison 2 1,865 VTD: Keels 1 Block: 450790113031007 90 Block: 450790113031008 67 Block: 450790113031009 120 Block: 450790113031010 0 Block: 450790113031012 241 Block: 450790113032000 0 Block: 450790113032001 14 Block: 450790113032002 11 Block: 450790113032003 18 Block: 450790113032004 623 Block: 450790113032005 89 Block: 450790113032006 84 Block: 450790113032007 0 Block: 450790113032008 58 Block: 450790113032009 34 Block: 450790113032010 45 Block: 450790113032011 121 Block: 450790113032012 56 Block: 450790113032013 15 Block: 450790113032014 34 Block: 450790113032015 18 Block: 450790113032016 36 Block: 450790113032017 33 Block: 450790113032018 22 Block: 450790113032019 33 Block: 450790113032020 53 Block: 450790113032021 51 Block: 450790113032022 0 Block: 450790113032023 0 Block: 450790113032024 14 Block: 450790113032025 0 Block: 450790113032026 37 Block: 450790113032027 34 Block: 450790113041015 0 Block: 450790113041016 0 Block: 450790113041017 16 Block: 450790113041018 25 Block: 450790113041019 105 Block: 450790113041020 148 Block: 450790113041021 0 Block: 450790113041022 0 Block: 450790113041023 5 Block: 450790114202022 0 VTD Keels 1 Subtotal 2,350 VTD: Keels 2 2,846 VTD: Keenan Block: 450790108042000 0 Block: 450790108042001 0 Block: 450790108042002 139 Block: 450790108042003 50 Block: 450790108042004 8 Block: 450790108042005 74 Block: 450790108042006 26 Block: 450790108042007 73 Block: 450790108042008 0 Block: 450790108042009 276 Block: 450790108042010 0 Block: 450790108042011 0 Block: 450790108042012 0 Block: 450790108042013 0 Block: 450790108042014 48 Block: 450790108042015 59 Block: 450790108042016 0 Block: 450790108042017 51 Block: 450790108042018 26 Block: 450790108042019 8 Block: 450790108042020 56 Block: 450790108042021 40 Block: 450790108042022 0 Block: 450790108042023 28 Block: 450790108042024 0 Block: 450790108042025 17 Block: 450790108042026 23 Block: 450790108042027 14 Block: 450790108042028 16 Block: 450790108042029 0 Block: 450790108042030 11 Block: 450790108042031 22 Block: 450790108042032 0 Block: 450790108042033 0 Block: 450790108042034 0 Block: 450790108042035 0 Block: 450790111011000 64 Block: 450790111011001 10 Block: 450790111011002 8 Block: 450790111011003 7 Block: 450790111011004 4 Block: 450790111011005 133 Block: 450790111011006 14 Block: 450790111011007 25 Block: 450790111011008 27 Block: 450790111011009 27 Block: 450790111011010 0 Block: 450790111011011 29 Block: 450790111011012 19 Block: 450790111011013 24 Block: 450790111011014 32 Block: 450790111011015 59 Block: 450790111011016 41 Block: 450790111011017 6 Block: 450790111011018 0 Block: 450790111011022 100 Block: 450790111011023 58 Block: 450790111011024 23 Block: 450790111011025 30 Block: 450790111011026 46 Block: 450790111011027 35 Block: 450790111011035 63 Block: 450790111011036 73 Block: 450790111011037 12 Block: 450790111011043 0 Block: 450790111011044 65 Block: 450790111011045 35 Block: 450790111011046 0 Block: 450790111011047 0 Block: 450790111011048 14 Block: 450790111011049 0 Block: 450790111013000 10 Block: 450790111013001 0 Block: 450790111013002 0 Block: 450790111013003 9 Block: 450790111013004 41 Block: 450790111013005 0 Block: 450790111013006 0 Block: 450790111013007 3 Block: 450790111013009 27 Block: 450790111013010 7 Block: 450790111013011 0 Block: 450790111013012 3 Block: 450790111013015 11 Block: 450790111013016 9 Block: 450790111013017 0 Block: 450790111013018 16 Block: 450790111013019 0 Block: 450790111013020 35 Block: 450790111013029 16 Block: 450790111013030 8 Block: 450790111013031 26 VTD Keenan Subtotal 2,369 VTD: Kingswood 4,179 VTD: Lincolnshire 2,980 VTD: Meadowlake 3,678 VTD: Midway Block: 450790111021000 0 Block: 450790111021001 0 Block: 450790113033038 0 Block: 450790113033039 0 Block: 450790113041000 0 Block: 450790113041001 0 Block: 450790113041002 0 Block: 450790113041003 0 Block: 450790113041004 0 Block: 450790113041005 0 Block: 450790113041006 0 Block: 450790113041007 0 Block: 450790113041008 70 Block: 450790113041009 163 Block: 450790113041010 119 Block: 450790113041011 0 Block: 450790113041012 0 Block: 450790113041013 8 Block: 450790113041014 0 Block: 450790113041024 0 Block: 450790113041025 0 Block: 450790113041026 0 Block: 450790113041027 0 Block: 450790113041028 0 Block: 450790113041029 96 Block: 450790113041030 25 Block: 450790113041031 34 Block: 450790113041032 59 Block: 450790113042001 0 Block: 450790113042003 94 Block: 450790113042004 32 Block: 450790113042005 22 Block: 450790113042006 39 Block: 450790113042007 74 Block: 450790113042008 27 Block: 450790113042009 74 Block: 450790113042010 36 Block: 450790113042011 64 Block: 450790113042012 148 Block: 450790113042013 61 Block: 450790113042014 62 Block: 450790113042015 0 Block: 450790113042016 64 Block: 450790113043000 0 Block: 450790113043001 0 Block: 450790113043002 0 Block: 450790113043003 0 Block: 450790113043004 0 Block: 450790113043005 87 Block: 450790113043006 29 Block: 450790113043007 431 Block: 450790113043008 97 Block: 450790113043009 50 Block: 450790113043010 81 Block: 450790113043011 40 Block: 450790113043012 28 Block: 450790113043013 120 Block: 450790113043014 78 Block: 450790113043015 86 Block: 450790113043016 73 Block: 450790113043017 40 Block: 450790113043018 14 Block: 450790113043019 104 Block: 450790113043020 0 Block: 450790113044000 1,482 Block: 450790113044001 42 Block: 450790113044002 63 Block: 450790113044003 126 Block: 450790113044004 131 Block: 450790113044005 84 Block: 450790113044006 0 Block: 450790113044007 0 Block: 450790113044008 157 Block: 450790113044009 5 Block: 450790113044010 0 VTD Midway Subtotal 4,819 VTD: Monticello 2,478 VTD: North Forest Acres Block: 450790111012006 14 Block: 450790111012016 120 Block: 450790111012017 14 Block: 450790111012018 4 Block: 450790111012019 0 Block: 450790111012020 11 Block: 450790111012022 0 Block: 450790111012025 22 Block: 450790111012026 328 Block: 450790111012027 0 Block: 450790112022000 258 Block: 450790112022002 289 Block: 450790112022003 13 Block: 450790112022004 19 Block: 450790112022006 0 Block: 450790112022017 29 Block: 450790112022018 37 Block: 450790112022019 42 Block: 450790112022020 23 Block: 450790112022021 83 Block: 450790112022022 26 Block: 450790112022023 58 Block: 450790112022024 8 Block: 450790112022027 1 Block: 450790112022032 30 Block: 450790112022034 91 Block: 450790112022035 46 Block: 450790112022036 34 Block: 450790112022037 14 Block: 450790112022038 34 Block: 450790112022039 53 Block: 450790112022040 58 Block: 450790112022041 40 Block: 450790112022042 8 Block: 450790112022043 0 VTD North Forest Acres Subtotal 1,807 VTD: Oak Pointe 1 1,871 VTD: Oak Pointe 2 1,120 VTD: Oak Pointe 3 1,532 VTD: Oakwood Block: 450790111021019 127 Block: 450790111021021 35 Block: 450790111021022 7 Block: 450790111021023 22 Block: 450790111021026 41 Block: 450790111021027 96 Block: 450790111021028 13 Block: 450790111021029 7 Block: 450790111021030 48 Block: 450790111021031 4 Block: 450790111021032 13 Block: 450790111021033 7 Block: 450790111021034 0 Block: 450790111021035 14 Block: 450790111021036 0 Block: 450790111021037 16 Block: 450790111021039 0 Block: 450790111021041 36 Block: 450790111021042 24 Block: 450790111021043 14 Block: 450790111021044 5 Block: 450790111021045 8 Block: 450790111021046 39 Block: 450790111021047 17 Block: 450790111021048 6 Block: 450790111021049 6 Block: 450790111021050 6 Block: 450790111021053 0 Block: 450790111021054 10 Block: 450790111021055 16 Block: 450790111021056 5 Block: 450790111021058 2 VTD Oakwood Subtotal 644 VTD: Old Friarsgate 2,035 VTD: Olympia Block: 450790026022041 0 Block: 450790026022042 0 Block: 450790026051018 0 Block: 450790026051021 0 Block: 450790117011000 0 Block: 450790117011001 0 Block: 450790117011002 0 Block: 450790117011003 0 Block: 450790117011004 0 Block: 450790117011005 15 Block: 450790117011006 24 Block: 450790117011007 32 Block: 450790117011008 28 Block: 450790117011009 6 Block: 450790117011010 20 Block: 450790117011011 22 Block: 450790117011012 0 Block: 450790117011013 181 Block: 450790117011014 58 Block: 450790117011015 34 Block: 450790117011016 40 Block: 450790117011017 1,304 Block: 450790117011018 0 Block: 450790117011023 0 Block: 450790117011024 0 Block: 450790117012000 0 Block: 450790117012001 0 Block: 450790117012002 9 Block: 450790117012003 11 Block: 450790117012004 0 Block: 450790117012005 0 Block: 450790117012006 7 Block: 450790117012007 8 Block: 450790117012008 23 Block: 450790117012009 0 Block: 450790117012010 0 Block: 450790117012011 16 Block: 450790117012012 0 Block: 450790117012013 0 Block: 450790117012014 0 Block: 450790117012015 6 Block: 450790117012016 0 Block: 450790117012017 0 Block: 450790117012018 164 Block: 450790117012019 25 Block: 450790117012020 0 Block: 450790117012021 46 Block: 450790117012022 0 Block: 450790117012043 0 Block: 450790117012044 0 Block: 450790117012061 15 Block: 450790117012062 7 Block: 450790117012063 0 Block: 450790117012064 6 Block: 450790117012065 0 Block: 450790117012066 0 Block: 450790117012070 0 Block: 450790117012080 5 Block: 450790117012081 0 VTD Olympia Subtotal 2,112 VTD: Parkridge 1 1,534 VTD: Parkridge 2 1,784 VTD: Pine Grove 2,726 VTD: Ridgewood 987 VTD: Riverside 2,275 VTD: Riversprings 1 1,567 VTD: Riversprings 2 1,883 VTD: Riversprings 3 1,954 VTD: Riverwalk 3,706 VTD: Skyland 1,964 VTD: South Beltline 2,584 VTD: South Forest Acres Block: 450790011001017 118 Block: 450790011001018 11 Block: 450790011001019 60 Block: 450790011001020 11 Block: 450790011001021 56 Block: 450790011001023 21 Block: 450790011001024 5 Block: 450790011001025 0 Block: 450790011001026 26 Block: 450790011001029 0 Block: 450790011001048 5 Block: 450790011001049 2 Block: 450790012001000 0 Block: 450790012001001 55 Block: 450790012001002 45 Block: 450790012001003 37 Block: 450790012001004 22 Block: 450790012001007 0 Block: 450790012001008 89 Block: 450790012001009 57 Block: 450790012001010 26 Block: 450790012001012 20 Block: 450790112011010 4 Block: 450790112011018 310 Block: 450790112011019 0 Block: 450790112011020 21 VTD South Forest Acres Subtotal 1,001 VTD: Spring Hill 3,572 VTD: Springville 1 2,866 VTD: Springville 2 2,620 VTD: St. Andrews 2,109 VTD: Trenholm Road Block: 450790111021002 18 Block: 450790111021003 0 Block: 450790111021004 0 Block: 450790111021005 0 Block: 450790111021006 0 Block: 450790111021007 48 Block: 450790111021008 0 Block: 450790111021009 220 Block: 450790111021010 30 Block: 450790111021011 23 Block: 450790111021012 5 Block: 450790111021013 146 Block: 450790111021014 94 Block: 450790111021015 7 Block: 450790111021016 127 Block: 450790111021017 0 Block: 450790111021018 18 Block: 450790111021020 0 Block: 450790111021024 37 Block: 450790111021025 0 Block: 450790111021038 0 Block: 450790111021040 0 Block: 450790111021057 3 Block: 450790111021059 209 Block: 450790113061000 0 Block: 450790113061001 54 Block: 450790113061002 17 VTD Trenholm Road Subtotal 1,056 VTD: Walden 6,558 VTD: Ward 10 Block: 450790027002000 97 Block: 450790027002001 115 Block: 450790027002002 28 Block: 450790027002003 42 Block: 450790027002004 70 Block: 450790027002005 43 Block: 450790027002006 39 Block: 450790027002007 8 Block: 450790027002008 58 Block: 450790027002009 41 Block: 450790027002010 104 Block: 450790027002011 32 Block: 450790027002012 34 Block: 450790027002013 36 Block: 450790027002014 127 Block: 450790027002015 24 Block: 450790027003001 39 Block: 450790027003002 34 Block: 450790027003003 37 Block: 450790027003004 56 Block: 450790027003005 68 Block: 450790027003006 35 Block: 450790027003008 36 Block: 450790027003009 42 Block: 450790027003010 60 Block: 450790027003011 38 Block: 450790027003012 64 Block: 450790027003013 50 Block: 450790027003015 19 Block: 450790027003016 12 Block: 450790027003017 43 Block: 450790027003018 21 Block: 450790027003020 27 Block: 450790027003021 53 Block: 450790027003022 52 Block: 450790027003023 59 Block: 450790027003027 55 Block: 450790027003029 35 Block: 450790027003030 31 Block: 450790027003031 17 Block: 450790027003032 18 Block: 450790027003033 31 Block: 450790027003034 9 Block: 450790027003035 17 VTD Ward 10 Subtotal 1,956 VTD: Ward 11 2,190 VTD: Ward 12 2,039 VTD: Ward 13 2,788 VTD: Ward 14 2,026 VTD: Ward 15 1,271 VTD: Ward 17 Block: 450790025004000 84 Block: 450790025004001 70 Block: 450790025004002 21 Block: 450790025004003 29 Block: 450790025004004 72 Block: 450790025004005 49 Block: 450790025004007 43 Block: 450790025004008 14 Block: 450790025004009 36 VTD Ward 17 Subtotal 418 VTD: Ward 18 2,026 VTD: Ward 19 2,163 VTD: Ward 2 2,394 VTD: Ward 20 2,383 VTD: Ward 21 2,570 VTD: Ward 22 2,175 VTD: Ward 23 1,308 VTD: Ward 29 2,030 VTD: Ward 3 2,011 VTD: Ward 30 2,342 VTD: Ward 31 1,728 VTD: Ward 32 1,205 VTD: Ward 33 1,388 VTD: Ward 34 1,476 VTD: Ward 4 1,969 VTD: Ward 6 1,834 VTD: Ward 7 1,809 VTD: Ward 8 1,591 VTD: Ward 9 1,379 VTD: Westminster 3,214 VTD: Whitewell 3,325 VTD: Woodfield 5,058 County Richland SC Subtotal 186,882 County: Saluda SC 18,862 District 3 Total 731,204 District 4 County: Greenville SC VTD: AIKEN 2,882 VTD: ALTAMONT FOREST 1,693 VTD: ASHETON LAKES 4,068 VTD: AVON 2,641 VTD: BAKER CREEK 2,435 VTD: BELLE MEADE 2,797 VTD: BELLS CROSSING 4,279 VTD: BELMONT 1,623 VTD: BEREA 3,443 VTD: BOILING SPRINGS 2,750 VTD: BOTANY WOODS 2,739 VTD: BRIDGE FORK 2,014 VTD: BROOKGLENN 1,788 VTD: CANEBRAKE 3,597 VTD: CAROLINA 2,657 VTD: CASTLE ROCK 4,104 VTD: CHESTNUT HILLS 3,090 VTD: CIRCLE CREEK 4,410 VTD: CLEAR CREEK 2,355 VTD: CONESTEE 3,467 VTD: DARBY RIDGE 3,930 VTD: DEL NORTE 3,455 VTD: DEVENGER 2,313 VTD: DONALDSON 2,250 VTD: DOVE TREE 2,632 VTD: DUNKLIN 3,829 VTD: EASTSIDE 3,795 VTD: EBENEZER 3,543 VTD: EDWARDS FOREST 3,234 VTD: ENOREE 4,688 VTD: FEASTER 2,321 VTD: FORK SHOALS 3,047 VTD: FOUNTAIN INN 1 5,157 VTD: FOUNTAIN INN 2 2,728 VTD: FOX CHASE 2,680 VTD: FROHAWK 2,213 VTD: FURMAN 5,893 VTD: GRANITE CREEK 4,167 VTD: GRAZE BRANCH 2,277 VTD: GREENBRIAR 2,388 VTD: GREENVILLE 1 2,198 VTD: GREENVILLE 10 4,258 VTD: GREENVILLE 14 2,879 VTD: GREENVILLE 16 2,502 VTD: GREENVILLE 17 2,107 VTD: GREENVILLE 18 2,136 VTD: GREENVILLE 19 3,488 VTD: GREENVILLE 20 1,610 VTD: GREENVILLE 21 1,793 VTD: GREENVILLE 22 3,046 VTD: GREENVILLE 23 2,783 VTD: GREENVILLE 24 7,307 VTD: GREENVILLE 25 3,400 VTD: GREENVILLE 26 3,075 VTD: GREENVILLE 27 2,999 VTD: GREENVILLE 28 1,588 VTD: GREENVILLE 29 3,740 VTD: GREENVILLE 3 3,338 VTD: GREENVILLE 4 4,465 VTD: GREENVILLE 5 3,722 VTD: GREENVILLE 6 1,326 VTD: GREENVILLE 7 4,509 VTD: GREENVILLE 8 4,567 VTD: GROVE 3,512 VTD: HILLCREST 3,560 VTD: HOLLY TREE 1,813 VTD: KILGORE FARMS 4,034 VTD: LAKEVIEW 5,479 VTD: LAUREL RIDGE 3,436 VTD: LEAWOOD 3,942 VTD: LOCUST HILL 2,122 VTD: LONG CREEK 2,484 VTD: MAPLE CREEK 4,336 VTD: MAULDIN 1 2,970 VTD: MAULDIN 2 6,409 VTD: MAULDIN 3 3,409 VTD: MAULDIN 4 4,642 VTD: MAULDIN 5 4,817 VTD: MAULDIN 6 2,930 VTD: MAULDIN 7 2,654 VTD: MISSION 3,421 VTD: MONAVIEW 5,928 VTD: MOORE CREEK 5,570 VTD: MOUNTAIN CREEK 2,803 VTD: MOUNTAIN VIEW 3,378 VTD: MT. PLEASANT 4,058 VTD: NEELY FARMS 4,822 VTD: NORTHWOOD 2,740 VTD: OAKVIEW 3,861 VTD: ONEAL 4,570 VTD: PALMETTO 2,924 VTD: PARIS MOUNTAIN 1,705 VTD: PEBBLE CREEK 2,799 VTD: PELHAM FALLS 1,570 VTD: PIEDMONT 5,218 VTD: PINEVIEW 1,985 VTD: POINSETT 4,944 VTD: RAINTREE 5,224 VTD: RANCH CREEK 4,300 VTD: REEDY FORK 4,524 VTD: RIVERSIDE 4,074 VTD: RIVERWALK 3,213 VTD: ROCK HILL 3,984 VTD: ROCKY CREEK 3,075 VTD: ROLLING GREEN 2,152 VTD: ROYAL OAKS 2,245 VTD: SALUDA 2,296 VTD: SANDY FLAT 4,745 VTD: SEVIER 3,694 VTD: SILVERLEAF 2,967 VTD: SIMPSONVILLE 1 4,067 VTD: SIMPSONVILLE 2 3,107 VTD: SIMPSONVILLE 3 3,685 VTD: SIMPSONVILLE 4 3,140 VTD: SIMPSONVILLE 5 3,783 VTD: SIMPSONVILLE 6 3,936 VTD: SOUTHSIDE 3,356 VTD: SPARROWS POINT 3,721 VTD: SPRING FOREST 3,337 VTD: STANDING SPRINGS 2,507 VTD: STONE VALLEY 3,525 VTD: STONEHAVEN 2,677 VTD: SUBER MILL 5,075 VTD: SUGAR CREEK 2,958 VTD: SULPHUR SPRINGS 4,421 VTD: SYCAMORE 4,357 VTD: TANGLEWOOD 4,775 VTD: TAYLORS 3,650 VTD: THORNBLADE 5,118 VTD: TIMBERLAKE 3,420 VTD: TRADE 4,337 VTD: TRAVELERS REST 1 3,695 VTD: TRAVELERS REST 2 2,619 VTD: TUBBS MOUNTAIN 3,582 VTD: TYGER RIVER 2,462 VTD: VERDMONT 3,123 VTD: WADE HAMPTON 4,440 VTD: WALNUT SPRINGS 8,550 VTD: WARE PLACE 3,160 VTD: WELCOME 4,589 VTD: WELLINGTON 2,137 VTD: WESTCLIFFE 3,693 VTD: WESTSIDE 5,107 VTD: WOODMONT 4,225 VTD: WOODRUFF LAKES 3,493 County Greenville SC Subtotal 503,373 County: Laurens SC 67,539 County: Spartanburg SC VTD: Abner Creek Baptist 3,407 VTD: Anderson Mill Baptist 2,445 VTD: Anderson Mill Elementary 3,612 VTD: Apalache Baptist 4,795 VTD: Arcadia Elementary 3,246 VTD: Beech Springs Intermediate 3,386 VTD: Bethany Baptist Block: 450830216001054 20 Block: 450830216001055 0 Block: 450830216001056 7 Block: 450830216001057 0 Block: 450830216001058 0 Block: 450830216001059 30 Block: 450830216001060 35 Block: 450830216001061 0 Block: 450830216001062 19 Block: 450830216001063 21 Block: 450830216001067 24 Block: 450830216001077 9 VTD Bethany Baptist Subtotal 165 VTD: Bethany Wesleyan 4,245 VTD: C.C. Woodson Recreation 2,374 VTD: Canaan 2,078 VTD: Cavins Hobbysville 1,496 VTD: Cedar Grove Baptist 2,380 VTD: Cleveland Elementary Block: 450830203011003 21 Block: 450830203011004 23 Block: 450830203011005 24 Block: 450830203011006 0 Block: 450830203011007 9 Block: 450830203011008 48 Block: 450830203011009 69 Block: 450830203011010 38 Block: 450830203011011 45 Block: 450830203011012 120 Block: 450830203011013 141 Block: 450830203011014 66 Block: 450830203011015 0 Block: 450830203011016 0 Block: 450830203011017 0 Block: 450830203011018 117 Block: 450830203011019 8 Block: 450830203011020 0 Block: 450830203011021 0 Block: 450830203011022 5 Block: 450830203011023 0 Block: 450830203011024 6 Block: 450830203011025 0 Block: 450830203011026 0 Block: 450830203011027 3 Block: 450830203011028 0 Block: 450830203011029 0 Block: 450830203012000 13 Block: 450830203012001 7 Block: 450830203012002 0 Block: 450830203012003 18 Block: 450830203012004 0 Block: 450830203012010 20 Block: 450830203012011 0 Block: 450830203012012 11 Block: 450830203012013 103 Block: 450830203012023 0 Block: 450830203012024 0 Block: 450830203012025 0 Block: 450830203012026 0 Block: 450830203012027 0 Block: 450830203012028 1 Block: 450830203012029 13 Block: 450830203012030 0 Block: 450830203013000 0 Block: 450830203013001 0 Block: 450830203013002 0 Block: 450830203013003 61 Block: 450830203013004 13 Block: 450830203013005 0 Block: 450830203013006 0 Block: 450830203013007 0 Block: 450830203013008 5 Block: 450830203013009 0 Block: 450830203013010 11 Block: 450830203013011 9 Block: 450830203013012 308 Block: 450830203013013 0 Block: 450830203013014 4 Block: 450830203013015 0 Block: 450830203013016 352 Block: 450830203013017 0 Block: 450830203013018 0 Block: 450830203013019 0 Block: 450830203013020 0 Block: 450830203013021 0 Block: 450830203013022 0 Block: 450830203013023 519 Block: 450830203013024 228 Block: 450830204001000 0 Block: 450830204001001 0 Block: 450830204001002 10 Block: 450830204001003 13 Block: 450830204001004 0 Block: 450830204001005 20 Block: 450830204001006 7 Block: 450830204001007 3 Block: 450830204001008 3 Block: 450830204001009 8 Block: 450830204001010 74 Block: 450830204001011 12 Block: 450830204001012 34 Block: 450830204001013 52 Block: 450830204001014 21 Block: 450830204001015 12 Block: 450830204001016 2 Block: 450830204001017 0 Block: 450830204001018 0 Block: 450830204001019 3 Block: 450830204001020 9 Block: 450830204001021 6 Block: 450830204001022 8 Block: 450830204001023 19 Block: 450830204001024 0 Block: 450830204001025 0 Block: 450830204001026 0 Block: 450830204001027 36 Block: 450830204001028 20 Block: 450830204001029 0 Block: 450830204001030 26 Block: 450830204001031 29 Block: 450830204001038 0 Block: 450830204001039 0 Block: 450830204002000 6 Block: 450830204002001 51 Block: 450830204002002 12 Block: 450830204002003 44 Block: 450830204002004 33 Block: 450830204002005 18 Block: 450830204002006 28 Block: 450830204002007 35 Block: 450830204002010 18 Block: 450830204002011 17 Block: 450830204002013 42 Block: 450830204002014 44 Block: 450830204002015 67 Block: 450830204002018 25 Block: 450830204002019 16 Block: 450830204002020 11 Block: 450830204002021 53 Block: 450830205001000 5 Block: 450830205001001 7 Block: 450830205001002 0 Block: 450830205001004 0 Block: 450830205001015 0 Block: 450830205001016 142 Block: 450830205001017 30 Block: 450830212001017 0 Block: 450830212001026 0 Block: 450830212001027 0 Block: 450830212001028 0 Block: 450830212001029 0 Block: 450830212001030 0 Block: 450830212001031 0 Block: 450830212001032 0 Block: 450830212001066 0 Block: 450830212001067 131 Block: 450830212001068 0 Block: 450830216001068 46 Block: 450830217002051 0 VTD Cleveland Elementary Subtotal 3,747 VTD: Cornerstone Baptist 2,294 VTD: Croft Baptist 2,110 VTD: Cross Anchor Fire Station 1,219 VTD: Duncan United Methodist 2,665 VTD: E.P. Todd Elementary 3,928 VTD: Ebenezer Baptist 1,522 VTD: Enoree First Baptist 2,322 VTD: Fairforest Middle School Block: 450830219021003 61 Block: 450830219021004 17 Block: 450830219021005 20 Block: 450830219021006 0 Block: 450830219021007 21 Block: 450830219021008 413 Block: 450830219021009 105 Block: 450830219021010 44 Block: 450830219021011 43 Block: 450830219021012 28 Block: 450830219021013 765 Block: 450830219021014 54 Block: 450830219021015 87 Block: 450830219021016 67 Block: 450830219021017 164 Block: 450830219021018 20 Block: 450830219021019 55 Block: 450830219021020 0 Block: 450830219021021 7 Block: 450830219021027 0 Block: 450830219021028 80 Block: 450830219031000 0 Block: 450830219031001 82 Block: 450830219031002 18 Block: 450830219031003 10 Block: 450830219031004 46 Block: 450830219031005 32 Block: 450830219031006 0 Block: 450830219031007 37 Block: 450830219031008 101 Block: 450830219031009 34 Block: 450830219031010 15 Block: 450830219031011 28 Block: 450830219031012 31 Block: 450830219031013 24 Block: 450830219031014 12 Block: 450830219031015 0 Block: 450830219031016 40 Block: 450830219031017 5 Block: 450830219031018 184 Block: 450830219031019 17 Block: 450830219031020 0 Block: 450830219031021 17 Block: 450830219031022 45 Block: 450830219031023 15 Block: 450830219031024 0 Block: 450830219031025 99 Block: 450830219031026 15 Block: 450830219031027 57 Block: 450830219031028 80 Block: 450830219031029 162 Block: 450830219031030 54 Block: 450830219031031 372 Block: 450830219031032 141 Block: 450830219031033 0 Block: 450830219031034 24 Block: 450830219031035 71 Block: 450830219031036 31 Block: 450830219031037 6 Block: 450830219031038 0 Block: 450830219031039 0 Block: 450830219031040 0 Block: 450830219031041 23 Block: 450830219031042 0 Block: 450830219031043 39 Block: 450830219041046 0 Block: 450830219041048 7 Block: 450830219041049 0 Block: 450830219041050 0 VTD Fairforest Middle School Subtotal 4,025 VTD: Gable Middle School 4,093 VTD: Holy Communion 4,050 VTD: Jesse Bobo Elementary 3,037 VTD: Lyman Town Hall 6,647 VTD: Mt. Calvary Presbyterian 4,901 VTD: Mt. Moriah Baptist 2,596 VTD: Mt. Zion Gospel Baptist 1,353 VTD: Park Hills Elementary 2,594 VTD: Pauline Glenn Springs Elementary 1,635 VTD: Pelham Fire Station 3,298 VTD: Poplar Springs Fire Station 3,580 VTD: Powell Saxon Una 4,548 VTD: R.D. Anderson Vocational 2,213 VTD: Reidville Elementary 4,379 VTD: Reidville Fire Station 5,659 VTD: River Ridge Elementary 4,456 VTD: Roebuck Bethlehem 2,334 VTD: Roebuck Elementary 4,420 VTD: Southside Baptist 2,023 VTD: Startex Fire Station 1,804 VTD: Travelers Rest Baptist 5,948 VTD: Trinity Methodist 3,200 VTD: Trinity Presbyterian 2,749 VTD: Victor Mill Methodist 4,138 VTD: Wellford Fire Station Block: 450830230021011 0 Block: 450830230021014 0 Block: 450830230021015 0 Block: 450830230021016 11 Block: 450830230021017 0 Block: 450830230021018 0 Block: 450830230021019 35 Block: 450830230021020 55 Block: 450830230021021 0 Block: 450830230021022 0 Block: 450830230021023 165 Block: 450830230021024 0 Block: 450830230021028 13 Block: 450830230021029 0 Block: 450830230021030 193 Block: 450830230021031 0 Block: 450830230021032 46 Block: 450830230021033 17 Block: 450830230021034 0 Block: 450830230021035 0 Block: 450830230021036 0 Block: 450830230021037 0 Block: 450830230021038 0 Block: 450830230021039 0 Block: 450830230021040 0 Block: 450830230021041 0 Block: 450830230021042 0 Block: 450830230021043 0 Block: 450830230021044 0 Block: 450830230021045 0 Block: 450830230021046 0 Block: 450830230021047 0 Block: 450830230021048 29 Block: 450830230021050 48 Block: 450830230021051 20 Block: 450830230021052 35 Block: 450830230021053 24 Block: 450830230021054 0 Block: 450830230021055 0 Block: 450830230021056 0 Block: 450830230021057 0 Block: 450830230021058 0 Block: 450830230021059 14 Block: 450830230021060 0 Block: 450830230021061 7 Block: 450830230021062 0 Block: 450830230021063 0 Block: 450830230021064 0 Block: 450830230021065 0 Block: 450830230021066 0 Block: 450830230021067 0 Block: 450830231031000 3 Block: 450830231031001 0 Block: 450830231031002 0 Block: 450830231031003 0 Block: 450830231031004 1 Block: 450830231031005 0 Block: 450830231031006 12 Block: 450830231031007 0 Block: 450830231031008 0 Block: 450830231031009 74 Block: 450830231031010 117 Block: 450830231031011 94 Block: 450830231031012 6 Block: 450830231031013 13 Block: 450830231031014 25 Block: 450830231031015 3 Block: 450830231031016 43 Block: 450830231031017 25 Block: 450830231031018 16 Block: 450830231031019 32 Block: 450830231031020 21 Block: 450830231031021 20 Block: 450830231031022 5 Block: 450830231031023 7 Block: 450830231031024 0 Block: 450830231031025 85 Block: 450830231031026 16 Block: 450830231031027 45 Block: 450830231031028 7 Block: 450830231031029 6 Block: 450830231031030 0 Block: 450830231031031 0 Block: 450830231031032 0 Block: 450830231031033 0 Block: 450830231031034 0 Block: 450830231031035 18 Block: 450830231031036 37 Block: 450830231031037 45 Block: 450830231031038 22 Block: 450830231031039 11 Block: 450830231031040 38 Block: 450830231031041 21 Block: 450830231031042 17 Block: 450830231031043 22 Block: 450830231031044 0 Block: 450830231031045 12 Block: 450830231031046 35 Block: 450830231031047 0 Block: 450830231031048 0 Block: 450830231031049 25 Block: 450830231031050 34 Block: 450830231031051 5 Block: 450830231031053 0 Block: 450830231031054 224 Block: 450830231031055 75 Block: 450830231031056 0 Block: 450830231031057 0 Block: 450830231031058 4 Block: 450830231031059 4 Block: 450830231031060 339 Block: 450830231031061 0 Block: 450830231031062 25 Block: 450830231031063 0 Block: 450830231031064 14 Block: 450830231031065 28 Block: 450830231031066 15 Block: 450830231031067 16 Block: 450830231031068 10 Block: 450830231031069 31 Block: 450830231031070 18 Block: 450830231031071 13 Block: 450830231031072 7 Block: 450830231031073 0 Block: 450830231031074 0 Block: 450830231031075 0 Block: 450830231031076 1 Block: 450830231031077 16 Block: 450830231031082 0 Block: 450830231031083 0 Block: 450830231031084 0 Block: 450830231031085 17 Block: 450830231031086 6 Block: 450830231031087 32 Block: 450830231031088 16 Block: 450830231031089 0 Block: 450830231031090 0 Block: 450830231031091 25 Block: 450830231031092 4 Block: 450830231031093 24 Block: 450830231031094 0 Block: 450830231031095 0 Block: 450830231042000 0 Block: 450830231042001 0 Block: 450830231043003 0 Block: 450830231043004 0 Block: 450830231043005 0 Block: 450830231043006 0 Block: 450830231043007 11 Block: 450830231043008 37 Block: 450830231043009 53 Block: 450830231043010 14 Block: 450830231043011 21 Block: 450830231043012 9 Block: 450830231043013 43 Block: 450830231043014 10 Block: 450830231043015 7 Block: 450830231043016 32 Block: 450830231043017 362 Block: 450830231043019 26 Block: 450830231043020 25 Block: 450830231043021 29 Block: 450830231043022 0 Block: 450830231043028 0 Block: 450830231043034 0 Block: 450830231043035 0 VTD Wellford Fire Station Subtotal 3,373 VTD: White Stone Methodist 1,323 VTD: Woodland Heights Recreation Center 3,347 VTD: Woodruff Elementary 4,799 VTD: Woodruff Fire Station 1,977 VTD: Woodruff Leisure Center 2,356 County Spartanburg SC Subtotal 160,291 District 4 Total 731,203 District 5 County: Cherokee SC 56,216 County: Chester SC 32,294 County: Fairfield SC 20,948 County: Greenville SC VTD: GOWENSVILLE 2,810 VTD: JENNINGS MILL 2,193 VTD: MARIDELL 2,888 VTD: SKYLAND 4,056 VTD: SLATER MARIETTA 5,430 VTD: TIGERVILLE 4,784 County Greenville SC Subtotal 22,161 County: Pickens SC VTD: Albert R. Lewis 1,940 VTD: Arial Mill 1,893 VTD: Cedar Rock 1,798 VTD: Crescent Hill 1,896 VTD: Crossroads 2,156 VTD: Crosswell 2,398 VTD: Dacusville 1,689 VTD: Easley Block: 450770108021000 112 Block: 450770108021001 125 Block: 450770108021002 0 Block: 450770108021003 28 Block: 450770108021004 20 Block: 450770108021005 53 Block: 450770108021006 14 Block: 450770108021007 16 Block: 450770108021008 49 Block: 450770108021009 29 Block: 450770108021010 8 Block: 450770108021011 35 Block: 450770108021012 32 Block: 450770108021013 37 Block: 450770108021014 39 Block: 450770108021015 32 Block: 450770108021016 16 Block: 450770108021017 24 Block: 450770108021018 11 Block: 450770108021019 50 Block: 450770108021020 143 Block: 450770108021022 24 Block: 450770108021024 34 Block: 450770108021025 34 Block: 450770108021026 19 Block: 450770108021027 15 Block: 450770108021028 0 Block: 450770108022000 3 Block: 450770108022001 76 Block: 450770108022002 49 Block: 450770108022003 93 Block: 450770108022004 9 Block: 450770108022005 21 Block: 450770108022006 34 Block: 450770108022007 39 Block: 450770108022008 0 Block: 450770108022009 56 Block: 450770108022010 20 Block: 450770108022011 44 Block: 450770108022012 12 Block: 450770108022013 55 Block: 450770108022014 0 Block: 450770108022015 8 Block: 450770108022016 20 Block: 450770108022017 40 Block: 450770108022018 0 Block: 450770108022019 11 Block: 450770108022020 22 Block: 450770108022021 0 Block: 450770108022022 6 Block: 450770108022023 57 Block: 450770108022024 10 Block: 450770108022025 21 Block: 450770108022026 69 Block: 450770108022027 0 Block: 450770108022028 12 Block: 450770108022029 43 Block: 450770108022030 20 Block: 450770108022031 11 Block: 450770108022032 18 Block: 450770108022033 22 Block: 450770108022034 29 Block: 450770108022035 0 Block: 450770108022036 0 Block: 450770108022037 13 Block: 450770108022038 39 Block: 450770108022039 19 Block: 450770108022040 14 Block: 450770108022041 9 Block: 450770108022042 30 Block: 450770108022043 17 Block: 450770108022044 11 Block: 450770108022045 0 Block: 450770108022046 0 Block: 450770108022047 7 Block: 450770108022048 0 Block: 450770108022049 0 Block: 450770108022050 19 Block: 450770108022051 27 Block: 450770108022052 10 Block: 450770108022053 39 Block: 450770108022054 0 Block: 450770108022072 0 Block: 450770108041003 0 Block: 450770108041005 0 Block: 450770108041006 0 Block: 450770108041007 0 Block: 450770108041008 30 Block: 450770108041019 0 Block: 450770108041020 0 Block: 450770108041021 0 VTD Easley Subtotal 2,213 VTD: East Pickens 2,028 VTD: Forest Acres 1,616 VTD: Fruit Mountain Block: 450770108062003 5 Block: 450770108062004 0 Block: 450770108062005 0 Block: 450770108062013 14 Block: 450770108062015 22 Block: 450770108062016 0 VTD Fruit Mountain Subtotal 41 VTD: Georges Creek 1,627 VTD: Glassy Mountain 2,090 VTD: Griffin 2,208 VTD: Holly Springs 1,971 VTD: Lenhardt 1,566 VTD: McKissick 2,076 VTD: Mountain View 2,161 VTD: Nine Forks 1,909 VTD: North Liberty 1,871 VTD: North Pickens 2,094 VTD: Pickensville Block: 450770108041011 32 Block: 450770108041012 19 Block: 450770108041045 16 Block: 450770108042014 69 Block: 450770108042015 14 Block: 450770108042016 29 Block: 450770108042017 17 Block: 450770108042018 37 Block: 450770108042019 44 Block: 450770108042020 31 Block: 450770108042021 18 Block: 450770108042022 40 Block: 450770108042027 20 Block: 450770108042028 14 Block: 450770108042031 29 VTD Pickensville Subtotal 429 VTD: Pope Field Block: 450770108042034 0 VTD Pope Field Subtotal 0 VTD: Praters Creek Block: 450770102021019 0 Block: 450770102021020 23 Block: 450770103011000 11 Block: 450770103011001 0 Block: 450770103011002 100 Block: 450770103011003 25 Block: 450770103011018 9 Block: 450770103011019 12 Block: 450770103011020 8 Block: 450770103011021 0 Block: 450770104041042 0 Block: 450770104041043 0 VTD Praters Creek Subtotal 188 VTD: Pumpkintown 2,141 VTD: Rock Springs 2,252 VTD: Saluda 2,241 VTD: Simpson Block: 450770108051025 266 Block: 450770108051026 16 Block: 450770108051027 14 Block: 450770108051028 21 Block: 450770108051029 0 Block: 450770108051030 6 Block: 450770108051031 25 Block: 450770108051032 13 Block: 450770108051036 0 Block: 450770108051037 8 Block: 450770108051038 0 Block: 450770108051039 7 Block: 450770108051040 20 Block: 450770108051041 0 Block: 450770108051042 5 Block: 450770108051043 0 Block: 450770108051044 0 Block: 450770108051045 0 Block: 450770108052031 47 Block: 450770108052032 0 Block: 450770108052039 17 Block: 450770108052040 12 Block: 450770108052041 17 Block: 450770108061000 10 Block: 450770108061001 9 Block: 450770108061002 23 Block: 450770108061003 30 Block: 450770108061004 11 Block: 450770108061005 71 Block: 450770108061006 17 Block: 450770108061007 15 Block: 450770108061009 0 Block: 450770108061010 0 Block: 450770108061011 24 Block: 450770108061012 8 Block: 450770108061013 8 Block: 450770108062000 41 Block: 450770108062001 3 Block: 450770108062002 29 Block: 450770108062012 31 VTD Simpson Subtotal 824 VTD: Skelton 1,725 VTD: South Pickens 2,147 VTD: Vinland 1,591 VTD: West Pickens Block: 450770102021000 23 Block: 450770102021001 258 Block: 450770102021005 134 Block: 450770102021006 66 Block: 450770102021007 32 Block: 450770102021009 15 Block: 450770102021010 14 Block: 450770102022029 117 Block: 450770104012032 23 Block: 450770104012033 12 Block: 450770104012034 16 Block: 450770104031015 0 Block: 450770104031026 0 Block: 450770104031028 5 Block: 450770104041000 23 Block: 450770104041001 0 Block: 450770104041002 119 Block: 450770104041003 13 Block: 450770104041004 173 Block: 450770104041005 12 Block: 450770104041006 9 Block: 450770104041007 38 Block: 450770104041008 72 Block: 450770104041009 0 Block: 450770104041010 22 Block: 450770104041011 46 Block: 450770104041012 0 Block: 450770104041013 0 Block: 450770104041014 2 Block: 450770104041015 17 Block: 450770104041016 7 Block: 450770104041017 55 Block: 450770104041018 5 Block: 450770104041019 72 Block: 450770104041020 70 Block: 450770104041021 11 Block: 450770104041022 12 Block: 450770104041023 13 Block: 450770104041024 9 Block: 450770104041025 6 Block: 450770104041026 40 Block: 450770104041027 53 Block: 450770104041028 3 Block: 450770104041029 11 Block: 450770104041030 40 Block: 450770104041031 0 Block: 450770104041032 72 Block: 450770104041033 10 Block: 450770104041034 30 Block: 450770104041035 49 Block: 450770104041036 30 Block: 450770104041037 35 Block: 450770104041038 46 Block: 450770104041039 14 Block: 450770104041041 1 Block: 450770104041045 27 Block: 450770104041046 0 Block: 450770104041047 36 Block: 450770104041049 20 VTD West Pickens Subtotal 2,038 County Pickens SC Subtotal 54,817 County: Richland SC VTD: Blythewood 1 2,980 VTD: Blythewood 2 3,379 VTD: Blythewood 3 3,818 VTD: Bookman 4,721 VTD: Briarwood Block: 450790113033000 184 Block: 450790113033001 87 Block: 450790113033002 17 Block: 450790113033003 1,093 Block: 450790113033004 25 Block: 450790113033005 13 Block: 450790113033006 39 Block: 450790113033007 39 Block: 450790113033008 86 Block: 450790113033009 11 Block: 450790113033010 16 Block: 450790113033011 0 Block: 450790113033012 0 Block: 450790113033014 0 Block: 450790113033036 0 Block: 450790113033042 31 Block: 450790114121005 22 Block: 450790114121008 8 Block: 450790114121009 0 Block: 450790114121021 0 Block: 450790114121022 0 Block: 450790114123000 0 Block: 450790114123001 17 Block: 450790114123002 74 Block: 450790114123003 0 Block: 450790114123004 31 Block: 450790114123005 100 Block: 450790114123006 54 Block: 450790114123007 35 Block: 450790114123008 35 Block: 450790114123009 42 Block: 450790114123010 50 Block: 450790114123011 67 Block: 450790114123012 14 Block: 450790114123013 17 Block: 450790114123014 37 Block: 450790114123015 106 Block: 450790114123016 34 Block: 450790114123017 59 Block: 450790114123018 38 Block: 450790114123019 135 Block: 450790114123020 56 Block: 450790114123021 70 Block: 450790114123022 28 Block: 450790114123023 55 Block: 450790114123024 15 Block: 450790114123025 13 Block: 450790114123026 25 Block: 450790114123027 64 Block: 450790114123028 58 Block: 450790114123029 29 Block: 450790114123030 81 Block: 450790114123031 21 VTD Briarwood Subtotal 3,131 VTD: Bridge Creek 3,169 VTD: Estates 3,005 VTD: Fairlawn Block: 450790101051002 458 Block: 450790101051003 69 Block: 450790101051004 104 Block: 450790101051005 74 Block: 450790101051006 121 Block: 450790101051007 22 Block: 450790101051008 12 Block: 450790101051009 0 Block: 450790101051010 10 Block: 450790101051011 0 Block: 450790101051012 25 Block: 450790101051013 9 Block: 450790101051014 205 Block: 450790101051015 69 Block: 450790101051016 35 Block: 450790101051017 74 Block: 450790101051018 54 Block: 450790101051019 89 Block: 450790101051020 94 Block: 450790101051021 10 Block: 450790101051022 76 Block: 450790101051023 21 Block: 450790102002025 11 Block: 450790102002026 30 Block: 450790102002027 8 Block: 450790102002028 32 Block: 450790102002034 16 Block: 450790102002035 7 Block: 450790102002036 7 Block: 450790102002037 0 Block: 450790102002038 4 Block: 450790102002046 79 Block: 450790102002047 0 Block: 450790102002048 0 Block: 450790102002049 0 Block: 450790102002050 38 Block: 450790102002051 0 Block: 450790102002052 0 Block: 450790102002053 19 Block: 450790102002054 0 Block: 450790102002056 0 Block: 450790102002057 28 Block: 450790102002058 0 Block: 450790102002059 0 Block: 450790102002060 0 Block: 450790102002061 35 Block: 450790107021000 28 Block: 450790107021001 195 Block: 450790107021002 88 Block: 450790114211000 0 Block: 450790114211001 305 Block: 450790114211003 0 Block: 450790114211004 459 Block: 450790114211005 256 Block: 450790114211006 112 Block: 450790114211007 30 Block: 450790114211008 18 Block: 450790114211009 0 Block: 450790114211010 18 Block: 450790114211011 62 Block: 450790114211012 23 Block: 450790114211013 220 Block: 450790114211014 28 Block: 450790114211015 71 Block: 450790114211016 0 Block: 450790114211017 0 Block: 450790114211018 0 Block: 450790114211019 14 Block: 450790114211020 0 Block: 450790114211021 10 VTD Fairlawn Subtotal 3,882 VTD: Keels 1 Block: 450790114202013 12 Block: 450790114202014 11 Block: 450790114202015 11 Block: 450790114202016 95 Block: 450790114202017 16 Block: 450790114202018 0 Block: 450790114202019 0 Block: 450790114202020 10 Block: 450790114202021 35 Block: 450790114202023 48 Block: 450790114202024 18 Block: 450790114202025 32 Block: 450790114202026 340 Block: 450790114202027 56 Block: 450790114202028 54 Block: 450790114202029 39 Block: 450790114202030 57 Block: 450790114202031 16 Block: 450790114202032 35 Block: 450790114202033 124 Block: 450790114202034 0 VTD Keels 1 Subtotal 1,009 VTD: Kelly Mill 3,420 VTD: Killian 4,335 VTD: Lake Carolina 4,965 VTD: Longcreek 6,737 VTD: Longleaf 2,991 VTD: Mallet Hill 4,292 VTD: Midway Block: 450790113033037 0 VTD Midway Subtotal 0 VTD: North Springs 1 1,758 VTD: North Springs 2 4,509 VTD: North Springs 3 2,863 VTD: Parkway 1 3,460 VTD: Parkway 2 3,503 VTD: Parkway 3 2,592 VTD: Polo Road 5,320 VTD: Pontiac 1 Block: 450790114071000 0 Block: 450790114071001 22 Block: 450790114071002 4 Block: 450790114071004 5 Block: 450790114071006 38 Block: 450790114071007 0 Block: 450790114071008 0 Block: 450790114071009 0 Block: 450790114071013 0 Block: 450790114071014 11 Block: 450790114071015 7 Block: 450790114071016 0 Block: 450790114071023 3 Block: 450790114071024 0 Block: 450790114072044 0 Block: 450790114072045 117 Block: 450790114072046 0 Block: 450790114072047 405 Block: 450790114072048 41 Block: 450790114072064 0 Block: 450790114072065 378 Block: 450790114072066 0 Block: 450790114072067 0 Block: 450790114072068 0 Block: 450790114072069 34 Block: 450790114072070 0 Block: 450790114072071 34 Block: 450790114072072 36 Block: 450790114072079 546 Block: 450790114072080 36 Block: 450790114072081 0 Block: 450790114072082 58 Block: 450790114072083 0 Block: 450790114072084 43 Block: 450790114072085 4 Block: 450790114072086 0 Block: 450790114072087 16 Block: 450790114072088 21 Block: 450790114072091 0 Block: 450790114072092 99 Block: 450790114072093 13 Block: 450790114072094 0 Block: 450790114072095 0 Block: 450790114072096 22 Block: 450790114072097 0 Block: 450790114072098 112 Block: 450790114072099 0 Block: 450790114072100 66 Block: 450790114072101 0 Block: 450790114072102 11 Block: 450790114141000 239 Block: 450790114141001 29 Block: 450790114141002 38 Block: 450790114141003 388 Block: 450790114141004 61 Block: 450790114141005 0 Block: 450790114141006 0 Block: 450790114141007 0 Block: 450790114141008 0 Block: 450790114141025 10 Block: 450790114141026 96 Block: 450790114141027 59 Block: 450790114141028 17 Block: 450790114141029 11 Block: 450790114141030 0 Block: 450790114141031 0 Block: 450790114141032 14 Block: 450790114141033 0 Block: 450790114141034 28 Block: 450790114141038 100 Block: 450790114141039 0 Block: 450790114141040 16 Block: 450790114141041 42 Block: 450790114141042 96 Block: 450790114141043 423 Block: 450790114141044 0 Block: 450790114141045 11 Block: 450790114141046 14 Block: 450790114141047 0 Block: 450790114141050 41 Block: 450790114141051 31 Block: 450790114141052 68 Block: 450790114141053 21 Block: 450790114141054 0 Block: 450790114141055 0 Block: 450790114141056 0 Block: 450790114141057 0 Block: 450790114141058 14 Block: 450790114141059 0 Block: 450790114141060 0 Block: 450790114141061 0 Block: 450790114141062 0 Block: 450790114141063 0 Block: 450790114141064 35 Block: 450790114141065 57 Block: 450790114141066 32 Block: 450790114141067 41 VTD Pontiac 1 Subtotal 4,214 VTD: Pontiac 2 3,436 VTD: Rice Creek 1 2,404 VTD: Rice Creek 2 4,189 VTD: Ridge View 1 3,895 VTD: Ridge View 2 4,697 VTD: Round Top 951 VTD: Sandlapper 4,584 VTD: Spring Valley 3,870 VTD: Spring Valley West 4,099 VTD: Valhalla 3,719 VTD: Valley State Park 5,427 VTD: Wildewood 3,982 County Richland SC Subtotal 129,306 County: Spartanburg SC VTD: Beaumont Methodist 1,445 VTD: Ben Avon Methodist 1,994 VTD: Bethany Baptist Block: 450830203012005 0 Block: 450830203012006 0 Block: 450830203012008 0 Block: 450830203012009 24 Block: 450830203012017 3 Block: 450830216001000 0 Block: 450830216001001 0 Block: 450830216001002 0 Block: 450830216001003 0 Block: 450830216001004 28 Block: 450830216001005 0 Block: 450830216001006 0 Block: 450830216001007 0 Block: 450830216001008 0 Block: 450830216001009 0 Block: 450830216001010 0 Block: 450830216001011 23 Block: 450830216001012 112 Block: 450830216001013 100 Block: 450830216001014 37 Block: 450830216001015 66 Block: 450830216001016 0 Block: 450830216001017 0 Block: 450830216001018 12 Block: 450830216001019 81 Block: 450830216001020 58 Block: 450830216001021 0 Block: 450830216001022 0 Block: 450830216001023 0 Block: 450830216001024 0 Block: 450830216001025 19 Block: 450830216001026 38 Block: 450830216001027 56 Block: 450830216001028 44 Block: 450830216001029 10 Block: 450830216001030 22 Block: 450830216001033 25 Block: 450830216001034 13 Block: 450830216001035 14 Block: 450830216001039 29 Block: 450830216001040 0 Block: 450830216001043 0 Block: 450830216001044 20 Block: 450830216001045 57 Block: 450830216001046 51 Block: 450830216001047 55 Block: 450830216001048 1 Block: 450830216001049 27 Block: 450830216001050 35 Block: 450830216001051 16 Block: 450830216001052 34 Block: 450830216001053 47 Block: 450830216001064 36 Block: 450830216001065 18 Block: 450830216001066 26 Block: 450830216001070 27 Block: 450830216001071 72 Block: 450830216001072 28 Block: 450830216001073 30 Block: 450830216001074 61 Block: 450830216001075 23 Block: 450830216001078 19 Block: 450830216002000 0 Block: 450830216002001 0 Block: 450830216002002 0 Block: 450830216002003 3 Block: 450830216002004 0 Block: 450830216002005 0 Block: 450830216002006 0 Block: 450830216002007 0 Block: 450830216002008 252 Block: 450830216002009 20 Block: 450830216002010 66 Block: 450830216002011 15 Block: 450830216002012 0 Block: 450830216002013 169 Block: 450830216002014 143 Block: 450830216002015 0 Block: 450830216002016 56 Block: 450830216002017 0 Block: 450830216002018 13 Block: 450830216002019 7 Block: 450830216002020 2 Block: 450830216002021 25 Block: 450830216002022 0 Block: 450830216002023 18 Block: 450830216002024 45 Block: 450830216002025 44 Block: 450830216002026 0 Block: 450830216002027 0 Block: 450830216002028 46 Block: 450830216002029 17 Block: 450830216002030 0 Block: 450830216002031 0 Block: 450830216002032 25 Block: 450830216002033 22 Block: 450830216002034 84 Block: 450830216002035 69 Block: 450830216002036 12 Block: 450830216002037 469 VTD Bethany Baptist Subtotal 3,119 VTD: Boiling Springs 9th Grade 6,645 VTD: Boiling Springs Elementary 7,524 VTD: Boiling Springs High School 2,556 VTD: Boiling Springs Intermediate 5,936 VTD: Boling Springs Jr. High 2,149 VTD: Broome High School 1,393 VTD: Cannons Elementary 1,766 VTD: Carlisle Fosters Grove 3,495 VTD: Carlisle Wesleyan 2,337 VTD: Chapman Elementary 3,126 VTD: Chapman High School 5,423 VTD: Cherokee Springs Fire Station 2,841 VTD: Chesnee Elementary 5,134 VTD: Cleveland Elementary Block: 450830203011000 0 Block: 450830203011001 66 Block: 450830203011002 52 Block: 450830203012007 0 Block: 450830203012014 0 Block: 450830203012015 20 Block: 450830203012016 16 Block: 450830203012018 43 Block: 450830203012019 44 Block: 450830203012020 228 Block: 450830203012021 26 Block: 450830203012022 0 Block: 450830215001037 0 Block: 450830215001038 0 Block: 450830215001039 0 Block: 450830215003011 0 Block: 450830215003012 0 Block: 450830216001031 80 Block: 450830216001032 88 Block: 450830216001036 0 Block: 450830216001037 14 Block: 450830216001038 0 Block: 450830216001041 0 Block: 450830216001042 17 Block: 450830216001069 17 Block: 450830216001076 6 VTD Cleveland Elementary Subtotal 717 VTD: Converse Fire Station 1,963 VTD: Cooley Springs Baptist 4,474 VTD: Cowpens Depot Museum 1,970 VTD: Cowpens Fire Station 2,821 VTD: Cudd Memorial 2,556 VTD: D. R. Hill Middle School 4,636 VTD: Daniel Morgan Technology Center 1,608 VTD: Dayton Fire Station 2,893 VTD: Eastside Baptist 1,891 VTD: Fairforest Elementary 4,920 VTD: Fairforest Middle School Block: 450830219041003 0 Block: 450830219041004 56 Block: 450830219041005 0 Block: 450830219041006 0 Block: 450830219041023 14 Block: 450830219041024 0 Block: 450830219041025 0 Block: 450830219041026 106 Block: 450830219041027 38 Block: 450830219041028 39 Block: 450830219041029 284 Block: 450830219041030 91 Block: 450830219041031 20 Block: 450830219041032 58 Block: 450830219041033 0 Block: 450830219041034 62 Block: 450830219041039 4 Block: 450830219041040 41 Block: 450830219041041 64 Block: 450830219041042 0 Block: 450830219041043 0 Block: 450830219041044 71 Block: 450830219041045 31 Block: 450830219041047 39 Block: 450830219041051 0 VTD Fairforest Middle School Subtotal 1,018 VTD: Glendale Fire Station 2,157 VTD: Gramling Methodist 2,501 VTD: Greater St. James 4,474 VTD: Hayne Baptist 6,402 VTD: Hendrix Elementary 4,154 VTD: Holly Springs Baptist 5,562 VTD: Hope 2,106 VTD: Jesse Boyd Elementary 2,629 VTD: Lake Bowen Baptist 6,603 VTD: Landrum High School 3,992 VTD: Landrum United Methodist 4,488 VTD: Lyman Elementary 3,242 VTD: Mayo Elementary 3,008 VTD: Morningside Baptist 2,639 VTD: Motlow Creek Baptist 1,649 VTD: Oakland Elementary 3,205 VTD: Pacolet Elementary 3,545 VTD: Spartanburg High School 3,122 VTD: St. John's Lutheran 1,687 VTD: Swofford Career Center 5,388 VTD: Wellford Fire Station Block: 450830228052021 17 Block: 450830228052023 33 Block: 450830228052028 0 Block: 450830228052029 99 Block: 450830228052030 12 Block: 450830228052031 0 Block: 450830228052038 7 Block: 450830228052039 0 Block: 450830228052040 0 Block: 450830228063026 0 Block: 450830228063027 59 Block: 450830228063030 0 Block: 450830228063031 0 Block: 450830228063032 53 Block: 450830228063033 16 Block: 450830228063034 11 Block: 450830228063035 7 Block: 450830228063036 20 Block: 450830228063053 54 Block: 450830228063054 38 Block: 450830228063055 7 Block: 450830228063056 25 Block: 450830228063057 11 Block: 450830228063058 17 Block: 450830228063059 74 Block: 450830228063060 7 Block: 450830228063061 3 Block: 450830230022000 87 Block: 450830230022001 33 Block: 450830230022002 3 Block: 450830230022003 265 Block: 450830230022004 84 Block: 450830230022005 0 Block: 450830230022006 69 Block: 450830230022007 24 Block: 450830230022008 24 Block: 450830230022009 15 Block: 450830230022010 1 Block: 450830230022011 18 Block: 450830230022012 5 Block: 450830230022013 8 Block: 450830230022014 7 Block: 450830230022015 18 Block: 450830230022016 21 Block: 450830230022017 25 Block: 450830230022018 0 Block: 450830230022019 28 Block: 450830230022020 15 Block: 450830230022021 8 Block: 450830230022022 93 Block: 450830230022023 0 Block: 450830230022024 0 Block: 450830230022025 4 Block: 450830230022048 0 Block: 450830230022049 0 Block: 450830230022050 0 Block: 450830230022051 24 Block: 450830230022052 40 VTD Wellford Fire Station Subtotal 1,489 VTD: West View Elementary 2,420 VTD: Whitlock Jr. High 2,894 County Spartanburg SC Subtotal 167,706 County: Union SC 27,244 County: York SC VTD: Adnah 1,222 VTD: Airport 2,449 VTD: Allison Creek 1,579 VTD: Anderson Road Block: 450910609011017 0 Block: 450910609011018 0 Block: 450910609011019 10 Block: 450910609011020 0 Block: 450910609011021 0 Block: 450910609011022 83 Block: 450910609011023 131 Block: 450910609011024 0 Block: 450910609011025 0 Block: 450910609011026 44 Block: 450910609011027 124 Block: 450910609011028 325 Block: 450910609011029 0 Block: 450910609011030 0 Block: 450910609011031 15 Block: 450910609011032 0 Block: 450910609011033 0 Block: 450910609011034 0 Block: 450910609011035 0 Block: 450910609011037 0 Block: 450910609011038 0 Block: 450910609011043 0 Block: 450910609011044 0 Block: 450910609011045 0 Block: 450910609011046 0 Block: 450910609011047 11 Block: 450910609011048 0 Block: 450910609011049 0 Block: 450910609011050 0 Block: 450910609011051 0 Block: 450910609011052 6 Block: 450910609011053 0 Block: 450910609011054 0 Block: 450910609011055 0 Block: 450910609011056 333 Block: 450910609011057 0 Block: 450910609011058 13 Block: 450910609011059 32 Block: 450910609011060 83 Block: 450910609011061 0 Block: 450910609011062 1 Block: 450910609011063 21 Block: 450910609011064 11 Block: 450910609011065 46 Block: 450910609011066 148 Block: 450910609011067 37 Block: 450910609011068 5 Block: 450910609011069 10 Block: 450910609011070 4 Block: 450910609011071 33 Block: 450910609011073 29 Block: 450910609011074 0 Block: 450910609011075 22 Block: 450910609011076 30 Block: 450910609011077 45 Block: 450910609013005 0 Block: 450910609013073 0 Block: 450910609013074 0 Block: 450910609013075 0 Block: 450910609013076 0 Block: 450910609013077 0 Block: 450910609013078 0 Block: 450910609013079 0 Block: 450910609013080 0 Block: 450910609013081 0 Block: 450910609013082 0 Block: 450910609013083 0 Block: 450910609013084 0 Block: 450910609013085 12 Block: 450910609013086 16 Block: 450910609013087 0 Block: 450910609013088 0 Block: 450910609013089 0 Block: 450910612042044 0 Block: 450910612042045 0 Block: 450910612042049 0 VTD Anderson Road Subtotal 1,680 VTD: Baxter 1,798 VTD: Bethany 3,160 VTD: Bethel 2,376 VTD: Bethel School 5,156 VTD: Bowling Green 2,396 VTD: Bullocks Creek 646 VTD: Cannon Mill 2,748 VTD: Catawba Block: 450910612032030 0 Block: 450910612032031 14 Block: 450910612032033 16 Block: 450910612032040 16 Block: 450910612033007 30 Block: 450910612033008 85 Block: 450910612033009 33 Block: 450910612033010 9 Block: 450910612033011 41 Block: 450910612033012 0 Block: 450910613021003 101 Block: 450910613021006 139 Block: 450910613021007 63 Block: 450910613021008 71 Block: 450910613021009 6 Block: 450910613021010 92 Block: 450910613021011 66 Block: 450910613021012 0 Block: 450910613021013 24 Block: 450910613021014 9 Block: 450910613021015 17 Block: 450910613021016 38 Block: 450910613021017 0 Block: 450910613021018 6 Block: 450910613021019 0 Block: 450910613021020 9 Block: 450910613021021 21 VTD Catawba Subtotal 906 VTD: Celanese Block: 450910608041000 23 Block: 450910608041001 0 Block: 450910608041002 0 Block: 450910608041003 17 Block: 450910608041004 0 Block: 450910608041005 0 Block: 450910608041006 816 Block: 450910608041007 71 Block: 450910608041008 38 Block: 450910608041009 23 Block: 450910608041010 9 Block: 450910608041011 56 Block: 450910608041012 60 Block: 450910608041013 49 Block: 450910608041014 6 Block: 450910608041015 54 Block: 450910608041016 27 Block: 450910608041017 0 Block: 450910608041018 0 Block: 450910608041019 23 Block: 450910608041020 0 Block: 450910608041021 69 Block: 450910608041022 13 Block: 450910608041023 61 Block: 450910608041024 0 Block: 450910608041025 31 Block: 450910608041026 44 Block: 450910608041027 32 Block: 450910608041028 42 Block: 450910608041029 22 Block: 450910608041030 0 Block: 450910608041031 0 Block: 450910608041032 0 Block: 450910608041033 11 Block: 450910608041034 15 Block: 450910608041035 16 Block: 450910608041036 33 Block: 450910608041037 10 Block: 450910608041038 11 Block: 450910608041039 0 Block: 450910608041040 18 Block: 450910608041041 0 Block: 450910608041042 9 Block: 450910608041043 0 Block: 450910609012000 0 Block: 450910609012001 0 Block: 450910609012002 18 Block: 450910609012003 0 Block: 450910609012004 0 Block: 450910609012005 0 Block: 450910609012006 514 Block: 450910609012007 0 Block: 450910609012008 1,306 Block: 450910609012009 0 Block: 450910609012010 0 Block: 450910609013016 0 Block: 450910609013017 0 Block: 450910609013043 0 Block: 450910609013050 0 Block: 450910609013059 0 Block: 450910609013060 33 Block: 450910609013061 16 Block: 450910609013062 72 Block: 450910609013063 54 Block: 450910609013064 0 Block: 450910609013065 0 Block: 450910609013066 20 Block: 450910609013067 11 Block: 450910609013068 0 Block: 450910609013069 0 Block: 450910609013070 0 Block: 450910609013071 0 Block: 450910609013072 0 Block: 450910609133013 0 VTD Celanese Subtotal 3,753 VTD: Clover 2,855 VTD: Cotton Belt 2,889 VTD: Crescent 2,704 VTD: Delphia 3,211 VTD: Ebenezer 1,556 VTD: Ebinport 4,179 VTD: Edgewood 4,234 VTD: Fairgrounds 5,042 VTD: Fewell Park 1,759 VTD: Filbert 2,805 VTD: Fort Mill No. 6 2,139 VTD: Gold Hill 4,779 VTD: Hampton Mill 2,488 VTD: Hands Mill 2,279 VTD: Harvest 1,663 VTD: Hickory Grove 1,686 VTD: Highland Park 2,150 VTD: Hollis Lakes 2,992 VTD: Independence Block: 450910612042031 0 Block: 450910612042032 0 Block: 450910612042033 0 Block: 450910612042034 0 Block: 450910612042035 22 Block: 450910612042037 0 Block: 450910612042039 0 Block: 450910612042056 0 Block: 450910612042057 9 Block: 450910612042058 0 Block: 450910612042059 0 Block: 450910612042060 0 Block: 450910612042061 12 Block: 450910612042062 0 Block: 450910613021000 381 Block: 450910613021001 0 Block: 450910613021002 23 Block: 450910613021004 49 Block: 450910613021005 10 Block: 450910613022003 0 Block: 450910613022005 6 Block: 450910613022006 12 Block: 450910613022013 0 VTD Independence Subtotal 524 VTD: India Hook 2,347 VTD: Kanawha 3,691 VTD: Lakeshore 3,565 VTD: Lakewood 2,313 VTD: Larne 2,496 VTD: Laurel Creek 1,806 VTD: Manchester 2,077 VTD: McConnells 2,445 VTD: Mill Creek 1,673 VTD: Mt. Gallant 2,156 VTD: Mt. Holly 4,180 VTD: New Home 3,390 VTD: Newport 2,916 VTD: Northside 2,637 VTD: Northwestern 2,915 VTD: Oakridge 3,919 VTD: Oakwood 3,126 VTD: Ogden 3,208 VTD: Old Pointe 2,293 VTD: Orchard Park 2,997 VTD: Palmetto 2,952 VTD: Pleasant Road 4,953 VTD: Pole Branch 3,242 VTD: River Hills 2,305 VTD: River's Edge 3,602 VTD: Rock Creek 2,154 VTD: Rock Hill No. 2 2,444 VTD: Rock Hill No. 3 2,890 VTD: Rock Hill No. 4 3,576 VTD: Rock Hill No. 5 2,352 VTD: Rock Hill No. 6 2,394 VTD: Rock Hill No. 7 4,236 VTD: Rock Hill No. 8 1,601 VTD: Roosevelt 2,250 VTD: Rosewood 5,363 VTD: Sharon 2,164 VTD: Shoreline 3,018 VTD: Smyrna 1,134 VTD: Springdale Block: 450910612042018 0 Block: 450910612042029 0 VTD Springdale Subtotal 0 VTD: Steele Creek 3,684 VTD: Tega Cay 1,629 VTD: Tirzah 3,120 VTD: Tools Fork 2,355 VTD: University 1,895 VTD: Waterstone 3,275 VTD: Windjammer 2,608 VTD: Wylie 2,600 VTD: York No. 1 3,685 VTD: York No. 2 5,078 County York SC Subtotal 220,512 District 5 Total 731,204 District 6 County: Berkeley SC VTD: Eadytown 869 VTD: Moultrie 1,770 VTD: Russellville Block: 450150202011050 0 Block: 450150202011051 13 Block: 450150202011052 0 Block: 450150202011053 11 Block: 450150202011054 0 Block: 450150202011055 0 Block: 450150202011056 0 Block: 450150202011057 8 Block: 450150202011058 8 Block: 450150202011062 0 Block: 450150202021033 24 Block: 450150202021034 0 Block: 450150202022000 0 Block: 450150202022001 0 Block: 450150202022002 0 Block: 450150202022003 0 Block: 450150202022004 0 Block: 450150202022005 0 Block: 450150202022006 0 Block: 450150202022007 112 Block: 450150202022008 0 Block: 450150202022009 10 Block: 450150202022010 32 Block: 450150202022011 17 Block: 450150202022012 18 Block: 450150202022016 5 Block: 450150202022018 0 Block: 450150202022038 48 Block: 450150202022039 8 Block: 450150202022040 7 Block: 450150202022041 11 Block: 450150202022049 1 Block: 450150202022050 4 Block: 450150202022051 9 Block: 450150202022052 14 Block: 450150202022053 2 Block: 450150202022054 7 Block: 450150202023000 41 Block: 450150202023001 29 Block: 450150202023002 55 Block: 450150202023003 18 Block: 450150202023004 0 Block: 450150202023005 4 Block: 450150202023006 33 Block: 450150202023007 16 Block: 450150202023008 0 Block: 450150202023009 0 Block: 450150202023010 27 Block: 450150202023011 136 Block: 450150202023012 9 Block: 450150202023013 1 Block: 450150202023014 30 Block: 450150202023015 81 Block: 450150202023060 0 Block: 450150202023061 33 Block: 450150202023062 38 Block: 450150202023063 83 Block: 450150202023064 16 Block: 450150202023065 12 Block: 450150202023067 0 Block: 450150202023068 0 Block: 450150202023069 0 Block: 450150202023070 0 Block: 450150202023071 22 Block: 450150202023072 0 Block: 450150202023073 0 Block: 450150202023074 0 Block: 450150202023075 0 Block: 450150202023076 0 Block: 450150202023079 2 Block: 450150202023080 31 Block: 450150202023081 11 Block: 450150202023082 21 VTD Russellville Subtotal 1,118 VTD: St. Stephen 1 Block: 450150202011009 134 Block: 450150202011010 0 Block: 450150202011011 15 Block: 450150202011012 1 Block: 450150202011013 0 Block: 450150202011014 15 Block: 450150202011015 0 Block: 450150202011016 9 Block: 450150202011017 3 Block: 450150202011018 9 Block: 450150202011027 22 Block: 450150202011035 9 Block: 450150202011037 8 Block: 450150202011038 0 Block: 450150202011039 54 Block: 450150202011040 19 Block: 450150202011041 0 Block: 450150202011042 34 Block: 450150202011043 26 Block: 450150202011044 31 Block: 450150202011045 258 Block: 450150202011046 0 Block: 450150202011049 59 Block: 450150202011061 9 Block: 450150202011066 0 Block: 450150202021000 0 Block: 450150202021001 0 Block: 450150202021002 0 Block: 450150202021003 0 Block: 450150202021004 0 Block: 450150202021005 133 Block: 450150202021006 11 Block: 450150202021007 8 Block: 450150202021008 10 Block: 450150202021009 38 Block: 450150202021010 57 Block: 450150202021011 9 Block: 450150202021012 62 Block: 450150202021013 22 Block: 450150202021014 0 Block: 450150202021015 0 Block: 450150202021016 0 Block: 450150202021017 0 Block: 450150202021018 0 Block: 450150202021019 0 Block: 450150202021020 0 Block: 450150202021021 0 Block: 450150202021023 24 Block: 450150202021024 203 Block: 450150202021025 14 Block: 450150202021026 25 Block: 450150202021027 0 Block: 450150202021028 57 Block: 450150202021029 77 Block: 450150202021030 38 Block: 450150202021031 26 Block: 450150202021032 28 Block: 450150202021035 51 Block: 450150202021036 11 Block: 450150202021037 53 Block: 450150202021038 0 Block: 450150202021039 0 Block: 450150202021040 0 Block: 450150202021041 6 Block: 450150202021042 0 Block: 450150202021043 13 Block: 450150202021044 0 Block: 450150202021045 0 Block: 450150202023077 0 Block: 450150202023078 3 VTD St. Stephen 1 Subtotal 1,694 VTD: St. Stephen 2 Block: 450150202011000 19 Block: 450150202011001 0 Block: 450150202011002 45 Block: 450150202011003 0 Block: 450150202011004 0 Block: 450150202011005 9 Block: 450150202011006 31 Block: 450150202011007 6 Block: 450150202011008 8 Block: 450150202011019 41 Block: 450150202011020 19 Block: 450150202011021 13 Block: 450150202011022 14 Block: 450150202011023 15 Block: 450150202011024 32 Block: 450150202011025 25 Block: 450150202011026 11 Block: 450150202011028 18 Block: 450150202011029 14 Block: 450150202011030 0 Block: 450150202011031 0 Block: 450150202011032 0 Block: 450150202011033 0 Block: 450150202011034 0 Block: 450150202011036 0 Block: 450150202012006 87 Block: 450150202012007 11 Block: 450150202012008 7 Block: 450150202012009 6 Block: 450150202012010 2 Block: 450150202012017 37 Block: 450150202012018 37 Block: 450150202012019 0 Block: 450150202012024 0 Block: 450150202012025 8 Block: 450150202012028 14 Block: 450150202012029 0 Block: 450150202012030 0 Block: 450150202012034 16 Block: 450150202012035 15 Block: 450150202012036 0 Block: 450150202012037 14 Block: 450150202012038 9 Block: 450150202012039 10 Block: 450150202012040 0 Block: 450150202012041 10 Block: 450150202012042 63 Block: 450150202012043 14 Block: 450150202012045 14 Block: 450150202012046 28 Block: 450150202012070 0 VTD St. Stephen 2 Subtotal 722 County Berkeley SC Subtotal 6,173 County: Chesterfield SC 43,273 County: Clarendon SC 31,144 County: Darlington SC 62,905 County: Dillon SC 28,292 County: Florence SC 137,059 County: Kershaw SC 65,403 County: Lancaster SC 96,016 County: Lee SC 16,531 County: Marion SC 29,183 County: Marlboro SC 26,667 County: Sumter SC VTD: BATES 746 VTD: BIRNIE 1,237 VTD: BUNRS-DOWNS 1,297 VTD: CAUSEWAY BRANCH 1 1,767 VTD: CAUSEWAY BRANCH 2 1,316 VTD: CHERRYVALE 1,290 VTD: CROSSWELL 2,173 VTD: DALZELL 1 Block: 450850002022022 0 Block: 450850002022023 0 Block: 450850002022024 0 Block: 450850002022025 54 Block: 450850002022029 46 Block: 450850002022030 14 Block: 450850002022032 9 Block: 450850002022033 43 Block: 450850002022034 59 Block: 450850002022035 67 Block: 450850002023001 0 Block: 450850002023004 0 Block: 450850002023005 103 Block: 450850002023006 1 Block: 450850002023007 21 Block: 450850002023008 12 Block: 450850002023009 8 Block: 450850002023010 49 Block: 450850002023011 14 Block: 450850002023012 7 Block: 450850002023013 71 Block: 450850002023014 74 Block: 450850002023015 0 Block: 450850002023017 0 Block: 450850002023018 29 Block: 450850002023019 0 Block: 450850002023020 29 Block: 450850002023021 12 Block: 450850002023028 16 Block: 450850002023029 10 Block: 450850002023030 4 Block: 450850002023067 0 Block: 450850002023068 0 Block: 450850002023069 22 Block: 450850002023070 21 VTD DALZELL 1 Subtotal 795 VTD: DALZELL 2 2,040 VTD: DELAINE Block: 450850018041008 130 Block: 450850018041009 14 Block: 450850018041012 40 Block: 450850018041013 85 Block: 450850018041014 34 Block: 450850018041015 11 Block: 450850018041016 52 Block: 450850018041017 12 Block: 450850018041018 175 Block: 450850018041019 0 Block: 450850018041020 0 Block: 450850018041021 0 Block: 450850018041022 0 Block: 450850018041023 0 Block: 450850018041024 0 Block: 450850018041025 0 Block: 450850018041026 0 Block: 450850018041027 0 Block: 450850018041028 0 Block: 450850018041029 0 Block: 450850018041030 0 Block: 450850018041031 0 Block: 450850018041032 0 Block: 450850018041033 0 Block: 450850018041034 0 Block: 450850018041035 0 Block: 450850018041036 0 Block: 450850018041037 0 Block: 450850018041038 0 Block: 450850018041039 0 Block: 450850018041040 23 Block: 450850018041041 18 Block: 450850018041042 12 Block: 450850018041043 16 Block: 450850018041044 0 Block: 450850018041045 144 Block: 450850018041046 47 Block: 450850018041047 9 Block: 450850018041048 7 Block: 450850018041049 11 Block: 450850018041050 10 Block: 450850018041051 44 Block: 450850018041052 14 Block: 450850018041053 39 Block: 450850018041054 50 Block: 450850018041055 42 Block: 450850018041056 2 Block: 450850018041057 0 Block: 450850018041058 126 Block: 450850018041059 14 Block: 450850018041060 56 Block: 450850018041061 13 Block: 450850018041062 31 Block: 450850018041063 8 Block: 450850018041064 50 Block: 450850018041065 23 Block: 450850018041066 50 Block: 450850018041067 0 Block: 450850018041068 20 Block: 450850018041069 9 Block: 450850018041070 34 Block: 450850018041071 0 Block: 450850018041072 15 Block: 450850018041075 0 Block: 450850018041076 10 Block: 450850018041077 1 Block: 450850018041078 3 Block: 450850018041079 0 Block: 450850018041080 0 Block: 450850018041081 0 Block: 450850018041082 0 Block: 450850018041083 0 Block: 450850018041084 4 Block: 450850018041085 0 Block: 450850018041086 0 Block: 450850018041087 0 Block: 450850018041089 0 Block: 450850018041090 0 Block: 450850018042000 257 Block: 450850018042001 10 Block: 450850018042002 1 Block: 450850018042003 70 Block: 450850018042004 14 Block: 450850018042005 56 Block: 450850018042006 29 Block: 450850018042007 2 VTD DELAINE Subtotal 1,947 VTD: EBENEZER 1 2,093 VTD: EBENEZER 2 2,515 VTD: FOLSOM PARK 2,980 VTD: FURMAN 2,392 VTD: GREEN SWAMP Block: 450850002023022 17 Block: 450850002023023 0 Block: 450850002023025 0 Block: 450850002023027 0 Block: 450850002023031 13 Block: 450850002023032 0 Block: 450850002023033 0 Block: 450850002023034 8 Block: 450850002023035 199 Block: 450850002023036 36 Block: 450850002023037 15 Block: 450850002023038 0 Block: 450850002023039 7 Block: 450850002023040 0 Block: 450850002023041 0 Block: 450850002023045 0 Block: 450850002023047 8 Block: 450850002023048 504 Block: 450850002023049 4 Block: 450850002023050 109 Block: 450850002023051 45 Block: 450850002023052 32 Block: 450850002023053 14 Block: 450850002023054 49 Block: 450850002023055 25 Block: 450850002023056 9 Block: 450850002023057 25 Block: 450850002023058 0 Block: 450850002023059 37 Block: 450850002023060 79 Block: 450850002023061 18 Block: 450850002023062 43 Block: 450850002023063 10 Block: 450850002023064 95 Block: 450850002023065 81 Block: 450850002023066 204 Block: 450850003003006 0 Block: 450850003003071 190 Block: 450850003003072 40 Block: 450850003003073 75 Block: 450850003003074 65 Block: 450850003003075 29 Block: 450850003003076 73 Block: 450850003003077 52 Block: 450850003003078 48 Block: 450850003003079 23 Block: 450850003003080 45 Block: 450850003003081 0 Block: 450850003003083 56 Block: 450850003003085 0 Block: 450850018031001 0 Block: 450850018031002 0 Block: 450850018031003 0 Block: 450850018031004 136 Block: 450850018031005 14 Block: 450850018031006 16 Block: 450850018031007 216 Block: 450850018031008 0 Block: 450850018031009 216 Block: 450850018031010 15 Block: 450850018031011 160 Block: 450850018031012 4 Block: 450850018031013 14 Block: 450850018031014 75 Block: 450850018031015 6 Block: 450850018031016 19 Block: 450850018031017 489 Block: 450850018031018 68 Block: 450850018031019 0 Block: 450850018031020 36 Block: 450850018031021 108 Block: 450850018031022 2 Block: 450850018031023 7 Block: 450850018031024 0 Block: 450850018031025 125 Block: 450850018031026 69 Block: 450850018031027 0 Block: 450850018031028 0 Block: 450850018031029 0 Block: 450850018031030 20 Block: 450850018031031 70 Block: 450850018031032 50 Block: 450850018031036 0 Block: 450850018031037 0 Block: 450850018031038 0 Block: 450850018032000 0 Block: 450850018032001 0 Block: 450850018032002 0 Block: 450850018032003 0 Block: 450850018032004 60 Block: 450850018032005 69 Block: 450850018032006 0 Block: 450850018032007 0 Block: 450850018032008 11 Block: 450850018032009 0 Block: 450850018032010 4 Block: 450850018032011 0 VTD GREEN SWAMP Subtotal 4,461 VTD: GREEN SWAMP 2 1,441 VTD: HAMPTON PARK 1,061 VTD: HILLCREST Block: 450850002021006 84 VTD HILLCREST Subtotal 84 VTD: LEMIRA 1,967 VTD: LORING 1,774 VTD: MAGNOLIA-HARMONY 1,213 VTD: MANCHESTER FOREST 2,258 VTD: MAYESVILLE 614 VTD: MAYEWOOD 1,723 VTD: MCCRAYS MILL 1 2,366 VTD: MCCRAYS MILL 2 2,353 VTD: MILLWOOD 1,019 VTD: MORRIS COLLEGE 1,750 VTD: MULBERRY 1,731 VTD: OSWEGO 1,564 VTD: PALMETTO PARK 2,593 VTD: PINEWOOD 2,592 VTD: POCOTALIGO 1 2,970 VTD: POCOTALIGO 2 2,335 VTD: PRIVATEER 3,361 VTD: REMBERT 2,888 VTD: SAINT JOHN 1,513 VTD: SAINT PAUL Block: 450850017012005 270 Block: 450850017012006 63 Block: 450850017012007 50 Block: 450850017012008 0 Block: 450850017012009 27 Block: 450850017012011 0 Block: 450850017012036 19 Block: 450850017012037 8 Block: 450850017012038 0 Block: 450850018032012 32 Block: 450850018032013 0 Block: 450850018032014 111 Block: 450850018032015 2 Block: 450850018032016 235 Block: 450850018032017 166 Block: 450850018032018 0 Block: 450850018032019 64 Block: 450850018032020 0 Block: 450850018032021 153 Block: 450850018032022 46 Block: 450850018032023 105 Block: 450850018032024 37 Block: 450850018032025 60 Block: 450850018032026 0 Block: 450850018033007 21 Block: 450850018034000 116 Block: 450850018034007 76 Block: 450850018041073 0 Block: 450850018041074 27 Block: 450850018042008 250 Block: 450850018042009 40 Block: 450850018042010 76 Block: 450850018042011 41 Block: 450850018042012 81 Block: 450850018042013 39 Block: 450850018043001 44 Block: 450850018043002 380 Block: 450850018043003 24 Block: 450850018043004 51 Block: 450850018043005 33 Block: 450850018043007 57 Block: 450850018043008 225 Block: 450850018043009 28 Block: 450850018043010 37 Block: 450850018043011 23 VTD SAINT PAUL Subtotal 3,117 VTD: SALEM 480 VTD: SALTERSTOWN 1,262 VTD: SAVAGE-GLOVER 708 VTD: SECOND MILL 2,195 VTD: SOUTH LIBERTY 810 VTD: SOUTH RED BAY 1,084 VTD: SPECTRUM 1,811 VTD: STONE HILL 814 VTD: SUMTER HIGH 1 1,024 VTD: SUMTER HIGH 2 1,849 VTD: SUNSET 2,001 VTD: SWAN LAKE 1,576 VTD: THOMAS SUMTER 1,588 VTD: TURKEY CREEK 1,686 VTD: WILDER 1,222 VTD: WILSON HALL 2,507 County Sumter SC Subtotal 95,953 County: Williamsburg SC 31,026 County: York SC VTD: Anderson Road Block: 450910609011000 0 Block: 450910609011001 0 Block: 450910609011002 0 Block: 450910609011003 0 Block: 450910609011004 0 Block: 450910609011005 0 Block: 450910609011006 0 Block: 450910609011007 0 Block: 450910609011008 752 Block: 450910609011009 5 Block: 450910609011010 0 Block: 450910609011011 0 Block: 450910609011012 52 Block: 450910609011013 0 Block: 450910609011014 3 Block: 450910609011015 146 Block: 450910609011016 0 Block: 450910609011041 0 Block: 450910609011042 0 Block: 450910612041000 0 Block: 450910612041001 0 Block: 450910612041002 0 Block: 450910612041003 0 Block: 450910612041019 0 Block: 450910612041023 12 Block: 450910612041024 21 Block: 450910612041025 0 Block: 450910612041026 24 VTD Anderson Road Subtotal 1,015 VTD: Carolina 2,475 VTD: Catawba Block: 450910612031027 11 Block: 450910612031028 17 Block: 450910612031029 46 Block: 450910612031030 28 Block: 450910612031031 0 Block: 450910612031032 32 Block: 450910612031033 195 Block: 450910612031034 63 Block: 450910612031035 66 Block: 450910612031036 156 Block: 450910612031037 8 Block: 450910612031038 0 Block: 450910612031040 0 Block: 450910612031041 0 Block: 450910612031042 0 Block: 450910612031043 0 Block: 450910612031044 0 Block: 450910612032011 25 Block: 450910612032012 90 Block: 450910612032014 0 Block: 450910612032015 3 Block: 450910612032017 78 Block: 450910612032018 60 Block: 450910612032019 0 Block: 450910612032020 25 Block: 450910612032021 0 Block: 450910612032022 0 Block: 450910612032023 399 Block: 450910612032024 0 Block: 450910612032025 18 Block: 450910612032026 47 Block: 450910612032027 23 Block: 450910612032028 55 Block: 450910612032029 73 Block: 450910612032032 58 Block: 450910612032034 118 Block: 450910612032035 95 Block: 450910612032036 29 Block: 450910612032037 0 Block: 450910612032038 24 Block: 450910612032039 1 Block: 450910612033000 51 Block: 450910612033001 154 Block: 450910612033002 43 Block: 450910612033003 32 Block: 450910612033004 80 Block: 450910612033005 258 Block: 450910612033006 50 Block: 450910612033013 0 Block: 450910612033014 14 Block: 450910612033015 3 Block: 450910612033016 42 Block: 450910612033017 48 Block: 450910612033018 67 Block: 450910612033019 38 Block: 450910612033020 8 Block: 450910612033021 12 Block: 450910612033022 58 Block: 450910612033023 22 Block: 450910612033024 66 Block: 450910612033025 54 Block: 450910612034014 191 Block: 450910612034015 15 Block: 450910612034016 47 Block: 450910612034017 22 Block: 450910612034018 48 Block: 450910612034019 19 Block: 450910612034021 60 Block: 450910612034023 62 VTD Catawba Subtotal 3,407 VTD: Celanese Block: 450910609013000 0 Block: 450910609013001 0 Block: 450910609013002 0 Block: 450910609013003 0 Block: 450910609013006 0 Block: 450910609013007 0 Block: 450910609013008 10 Block: 450910609013009 0 Block: 450910609013010 0 Block: 450910609013011 59 Block: 450910609013012 19 Block: 450910609013013 0 Block: 450910609013014 0 Block: 450910609013015 0 Block: 450910609013018 0 Block: 450910609013019 556 Block: 450910609013020 12 Block: 450910609013021 15 Block: 450910609013022 18 Block: 450910609013023 0 Block: 450910609013024 0 Block: 450910609013025 71 Block: 450910609013026 28 Block: 450910609013027 31 Block: 450910609013028 70 Block: 450910609013029 7 Block: 450910609013030 0 Block: 450910609013031 46 Block: 450910609013032 79 Block: 450910609013033 46 Block: 450910609013034 59 Block: 450910609013035 0 Block: 450910609013036 83 Block: 450910609013037 104 Block: 450910609013038 50 Block: 450910609013039 29 Block: 450910609013040 6 Block: 450910609013041 6 Block: 450910609013042 0 Block: 450910609013044 2 Block: 450910609013045 0 Block: 450910609013046 0 Block: 450910609013047 0 Block: 450910609013048 0 Block: 450910609013049 0 Block: 450910609013051 0 Block: 450910609013052 0 Block: 450910609013053 10 Block: 450910609013054 51 Block: 450910609013055 0 Block: 450910609013056 0 Block: 450910609013057 8 Block: 450910609013058 0 Block: 450910609013090 13 Block: 450910609013091 54 Block: 450910609013092 0 Block: 450910609013093 52 Block: 450910609013094 37 Block: 450910609013095 0 Block: 450910609013096 25 Block: 450910609013097 0 VTD Celanese Subtotal 1,656 VTD: Dobys Bridge 3,983 VTD: Ferry Branch 1,954 VTD: Fort Mill No. 1 4,390 VTD: Fort Mill No. 2 7,581 VTD: Fort Mill No. 3 2,938 VTD: Fort Mill No. 4 2,336 VTD: Fort Mill No. 5 4,050 VTD: Friendship 1,326 VTD: Hopewell 2,054 VTD: Independence Block: 450910612041030 0 Block: 450910612042069 36 Block: 450910612042070 0 Block: 450910612042071 0 Block: 450910612051012 0 Block: 450910612051015 0 Block: 450910612051016 141 Block: 450910612051017 52 Block: 450910612051018 49 Block: 450910612051019 30 Block: 450910612051032 230 Block: 450910612051033 16 Block: 450910612051042 158 Block: 450910612051043 88 Block: 450910612051044 77 VTD Independence Subtotal 877 VTD: Lesslie 2,181 VTD: Nation Ford 4,332 VTD: Neelys Creek 1,612 VTD: Riverview 2,460 VTD: Six Mile 1,774 VTD: Springdale Block: 450910609011040 0 Block: 450910611011010 0 Block: 450910612041004 0 Block: 450910612041005 0 Block: 450910612041006 1,080 Block: 450910612041007 43 Block: 450910612041008 60 Block: 450910612041009 64 Block: 450910612041010 0 Block: 450910612041011 54 Block: 450910612041012 124 Block: 450910612041013 83 Block: 450910612041014 0 Block: 450910612041015 117 Block: 450910612041016 104 Block: 450910612041017 0 Block: 450910612041018 147 Block: 450910612041020 16 Block: 450910612041021 64 Block: 450910612041022 95 Block: 450910612041027 0 Block: 450910612041028 0 Block: 450910612041029 0 Block: 450910612041031 0 Block: 450910612041032 0 Block: 450910612041033 0 Block: 450910612041034 0 Block: 450910612041035 61 Block: 450910612041036 8 Block: 450910612041037 59 Block: 450910612041038 52 Block: 450910612052044 0 Block: 450910612052045 0 Block: 450910612052050 0 VTD Springdale Subtotal 2,231 VTD: Springfield 3,272 VTD: Stateline 3,674 County York SC Subtotal 61,578 District 6 Total 731,203 District 7 County: Charleston SC VTD: Awendaw 1,621 VTD: Charleston 1 795 VTD: Charleston 10 1,336 VTD: Charleston 11 2,040 VTD: Charleston 12 4,169 VTD: Charleston 13 1,457 VTD: Charleston 14 1,748 VTD: Charleston 15 2,793 VTD: Charleston 16 1,384 VTD: Charleston 17 1,307 VTD: Charleston 18 1,735 VTD: Charleston 19 986 VTD: Charleston 2 976 VTD: Charleston 20 1,576 VTD: Charleston 21 1,168 VTD: Charleston 3 1,062 VTD: Charleston 4 1,145 VTD: Charleston 5 1,053 VTD: Charleston 6 1,736 VTD: Charleston 7 2,498 VTD: Charleston 8 1,697 VTD: Charleston 9 1,389 VTD: Christ Church 1,164 VTD: Deer Park 1A 2,730 VTD: Deer Park 1B 7,708 VTD: Deer Park 2A 5,042 VTD: Deer Park 2B 3,280 VTD: Deer Park 2C 1,540 VTD: Deer Park 3 4,771 VTD: Folly Beach 1 920 VTD: Folly Beach 2 1,196 VTD: Isle Of Palms 1A 1,120 VTD: Isle of Palms 1B 1,524 VTD: Isle of Palms 1C 1,758 VTD: James Island 10 2,195 VTD: James Island 11 2,559 VTD: James Island 12 1,661 VTD: James Island 13 2,088 VTD: James Island 14 1,129 VTD: James Island 15 2,166 VTD: James Island 17 2,355 VTD: James Island 19 2,233 VTD: James Island 1A 2,687 VTD: James Island 1B 1,408 VTD: James Island 20 1,976 VTD: James Island 22 1,920 VTD: James Island 3 1,069 VTD: James Island 5A 1,875 VTD: James Island 5B 1,108 VTD: James Island 6 2,102 VTD: James Island 7 2,684 VTD: James Island 8A 1,842 VTD: James Island 8B 2,568 VTD: James Island 9 1,837 VTD: Ladson 5,160 VTD: Lincolnville 3,471 VTD: McClellanville 1,975 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 1 1,904 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 10 1,358 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 11 1,903 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 12 3,436 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 13 1,630 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 14 2,113 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 15 2,919 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 16 948 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 17 3,786 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 18 1,528 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 19 2,968 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 2 1,564 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 20 1,715 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 21 2,194 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 22 2,266 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 23 2,724 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 24 1,040 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 25 1,402 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 26 734 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 27 4,062 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 28 1,560 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 29 385 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 3 1,914 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 30 2,607 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 31 2,093 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 32 3,609 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 33 5,428 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 34 2,358 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 35 7,539 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 36 2,481 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 37 4,732 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 38 2,331 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 39 5,875 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 4 2,032 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 5 1,644 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 6 2,648 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 7 1,353 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 8 1,193 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 9 1,354 VTD: North Charleston 1 1,110 VTD: North Charleston 10 2,970 VTD: North Charleston 11 1,055 VTD: North Charleston 12 1,379 VTD: North Charleston 13 1,662 VTD: North Charleston 14 931 VTD: North Charleston 15 2,365 VTD: North Charleston 16 1,555 VTD: North Charleston 17 1,526 VTD: North Charleston 18 3,448 VTD: North Charleston 19 1,843 VTD: North Charleston 2 1,789 VTD: North Charleston 20 1,280 VTD: North Charleston 21 2,704 VTD: North Charleston 22 2,642 VTD: North Charleston 23 3,360 VTD: North Charleston 24 5,435 VTD: North Charleston 25 1,018 VTD: North Charleston 26 922 VTD: North Charleston 27 3,061 VTD: North Charleston 28 3,038 VTD: North Charleston 29 2,738 VTD: North Charleston 3 1,594 VTD: North Charleston 30 2,995 VTD: North Charleston 4 1,807 VTD: North Charleston 5 2,709 VTD: North Charleston 6 2,048 VTD: North Charleston 7 2,354 VTD: North Charleston 8 1,267 VTD: North Charleston 9 2,754 VTD: St. Andrews 1 885 VTD: St. Andrews 10 1,484 VTD: St. Andrews 11 1,127 VTD: St. Andrews 12 1,305 VTD: St. Andrews 13 1,603 VTD: St. Andrews 14 1,977 VTD: St. Andrews 15 2,036 VTD: St. Andrews 16 Block: 450190028021019 0 Block: 450190028021020 0 Block: 450190028021021 0 Block: 450190028021022 0 Block: 450190028021023 0 VTD St. Andrews 16 Subtotal 0 VTD: St. Andrews 18 2,724 VTD: St. Andrews 19 424 VTD: St. Andrews 2 1,393 VTD: St. Andrews 20 3,922 VTD: St. Andrews 21 1,385 VTD: St. Andrews 22 Block: 450190026121002 0 Block: 450190026121003 0 Block: 450190026121004 0 Block: 450190026121008 0 VTD St. Andrews 22 Subtotal 0 VTD: St. Andrews 24 2,004 VTD: St. Andrews 25 2,305 VTD: St. Andrews 26 Block: 450190026141017 8 Block: 450190026141023 1 Block: 450190026141044 25 Block: 450190026141045 6 Block: 450190026141046 88 Block: 450190026141047 9 Block: 450190026141048 8 Block: 450190026141050 9 Block: 450190026141051 11 Block: 450190026141052 5 Block: 450190026141053 11 Block: 450190026142000 22 Block: 450190026142001 5 Block: 450190026142002 8 Block: 450190026142003 34 Block: 450190026142004 4 Block: 450190026142005 34 Block: 450190026142006 7 Block: 450190026142007 2 Block: 450190026142026 11 Block: 450190026142028 17 Block: 450190026142029 11 Block: 450190026142031 22 Block: 450190026142032 13 Block: 450190026142033 0 Block: 450190026142034 3 Block: 450190026142064 6 Block: 450190026142065 6 VTD St. Andrews 26 Subtotal 386 VTD: St. Andrews 3 1,571 VTD: St. Andrews 4 1,993 VTD: St. Andrews 5 1,669 VTD: St. Andrews 6 1,432 VTD: St. Andrews 7 Block: 450190028021000 46 Block: 450190028021001 35 Block: 450190028021002 77 Block: 450190028021003 25 Block: 450190028021004 26 Block: 450190028021005 13 Block: 450190028021006 23 Block: 450190028021007 86 Block: 450190028021008 143 Block: 450190028021009 26 Block: 450190028021010 57 Block: 450190028021011 51 Block: 450190028021012 97 Block: 450190028021013 28 Block: 450190028021014 16 Block: 450190028021015 0 Block: 450190028021016 42 Block: 450190028021017 22 Block: 450190028021018 8 Block: 450190028021024 0 Block: 450190028021025 14 Block: 450190028021026 0 Block: 450190028021027 0 Block: 450190028021028 11 Block: 450190028021029 6 Block: 450190028021030 11 Block: 450190028021031 10 Block: 450190028021032 2 Block: 450190028021033 28 Block: 450190028021034 0 Block: 450190028021035 35 Block: 450190028021036 17 Block: 450190028021037 10 Block: 450190028021038 21 Block: 450190028021039 0 Block: 450190028021040 0 Block: 450190028021041 0 Block: 450190028021042 0 Block: 450190028021043 0 Block: 450190028021044 0 Block: 450190028021045 0 Block: 450190028021046 0 Block: 450190028021048 0 Block: 450190028021051 0 Block: 450190028021052 19 Block: 450190028021053 5 Block: 450190028021054 64 Block: 450190028021055 23 Block: 450190028021056 22 Block: 450190028021057 6 Block: 450190028021058 7 Block: 450190028021059 9 Block: 450190028021060 2 Block: 450190028021061 10 Block: 450190028021062 2 Block: 450190028021063 0 Block: 450190028021064 8 Block: 450190028021065 0 Block: 450190028021066 6 Block: 450190028021067 44 Block: 450190028021068 14 Block: 450190028021069 1 Block: 450190028022013 3 VTD St. Andrews 7 Subtotal 1,231 VTD: St. Andrews 8 1,100 VTD: St. Andrews 9 1,743 VTD: Sullivans Island 1,891 County Charleston SC Subtotal 316,771 County: Georgetown SC 63,404 County: Horry SC 351,029 District 7 Total 731,204 State Totals 5,118,425 SECTION 2.  Section 7-19-45 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 3.  Any person elected or appointed to serve, or serving, as a member of any board, commission, or committee to represent a congressional district, whose residency is transferred to another district by a change in the composition of the district, may serve, or continue to serve, the term of office for which he was elected or appointed; however, the appointing or electing authority shall appoint or elect an additional member on that board, commission, or committee from the district which loses a resident member as a result of the transfer to serve until the term of the transferred member expires.  When a vacancy occurs in the district to which a member has been transferred, the vacancy must not be filled until the full term of the transferred member expires. SECTION 4.  (A)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 7-11-15 or 7-11-210, and for 2026 only, the dates for filing for all candidates seeking nomination by a political party primary or a political party convention for one of the seven seats in the U.S. House of Representatives is between noon on June first and noon on June fifth. (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 7-13-45, notice of the dates of the filing period set forth in item (1) for candidates for U.S. House of Representatives, the place and street address where filings may be made, and the hours an authorized person will be present to receive filings must be published on the State Election Commission's website as soon as practicable following the enactment of this act. (B) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 7-13-15 or 7-13-40, and for 2026 only, a special primary must be held on August 18, 2026, for the seven seats in the U.S. House of Representatives to be voted on in the November 3, 2026, general election. Written certification of the names of all candidates for the seven seats in the U.S. House of Representatives to be placed on the special primary ballots must be made by the political party chairman, vice chairman, or secretary to the State Election Commission no later than noon on June 9, 2026. (C) A special runoff primary, if necessary, must be held on September 1, 2026. (D) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 7-13-350, written certification of the names of the nominees for the seven seats in the U.S. House of Representatives to be placed on the November 3, 2026, general election ballot must be made by the political party chairman, vice chairman, or secretary to the State Election Commission no later than noon on September 9, 2026. (E)(1) Only votes cast in the special primary and subsequent runoff, if necessary, for candidates for U.S. House may be counted for purposes of determining the names of nominees to appear on the November 3, 2026, general election ballots. No votes cast in the June 9, 2026, statewide primaries for candidates for U.S. House may be counted for these purposes. (2) In conducting the June 9, 2026, statewide primaries and subsequent runoffs, each county board of voter registration and elections must post signs or other appropriate notices in conspicuous locations informing voters of the impact of the provisions of item (1) on ballots being cast. The language to be printed on these signs must be approved by the State Election Commission or its executive director. (F) In conducting the special primaries and runoffs, each county board of voter registration and elections may combine polling places for reasons including, but not limited to, the availability of poll workers and polling locations. Provided, each county board of voter registration and elections must ensure voters have adequate notice and access to polling places. (G)(1) The State Election Commission shall issue a refund in the amount of the filing fee paid by any person under Section 7-13-40 who filed as a candidate for U.S. House of Representatives for the June 9, 2026, statewide primaries and does not again file as a candidate under subsection (A). (2) A person who filed as a candidate for U.S. House of Representatives for the June 9, 2026, statewide primaries and paid the filing fee required under Section 7-13-40 may file again to be a candidate under subsection (A) by filing the appropriate statement of intention of candidacy and party pledge without an additional filing fee. (H) In the event of a conflict between this act and the provisions of Title 7 of the S.C. Code, the provisions of this act shall control. SECTION 5.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----